I say this all of the time. It would be like white people saying they are European-American. That is totally stupid.
I received this collection of Echo Park's Times & Seasons from my Secret Santa this past Christmas and I have been wanting to use it for something like this. This challenge was perfect for getting these papers out and taking some fun photos of the boys.
Ugh, I was so bummed. Had that been listed while we were searching for place, or had we waited a few .... 5 months, I would have been all over that house!
Any person who allows themselves to be treated with such disdain and disrespect by an insecure partner gets what they deserve if they believe in any way that their partner’s consistent outright flirting with other individuals of the opposite sex in front of them shows their desirability. All it really shows is they are DESPERATE to prove something and that they are testing you! Relationships should not be tests. If you find yourself with someone who is constantly trying to “test” you once you are in a relationship, then it’s time to definitely move on b/c that person truly has issues and cannot seem to resolve their own internal issues with themselves and their value without dragging someone else through the mud to validate themselves.
And if you happen to be near a computer tomorrow, I do have my Easter post all revved up and ready to go.
journaling. I started my current blog, The Crafty Corgi, in February
These were all entered into the challenges over at Crafters Digital Art Centre . Go check it out! Its really a whole lot of fun all in one place! I'm going back over there now because the new challenges starts today!
Wow thanks for another great week of participation here at Stamp Something! We are really excited about our month long birthday celebration and you all are making it extra special by playing along with us and sharing your creations! Big congrats to our blog candy winner, mystery candy winner, and Top 5 Stampers from last week. And another HUGE thanks to Katharina and Whiff of Joy for their blog candy donation! And a big thanks also Whimsy Stamps for the mystery candy for our 100th week challenge!
Sam and I have been friends -- albeit cyber, unfortunately -- for about two years. I have always appreciated no, let's be frank, I've always been in awe of her sophisticated approach to entertaining and the ease with which she seems to whip up chef worthy marvels in her kitchen. I love to hear about her travels, her discoveries, what's for dinner. . .
Meditation
you have not recognized yourself.
Socrates sounded like several bands that were popular at the time, Jimi Hendrix Experience, Deep Purple, Blue Cheer, and Black Sabbath come to mind now when I hear their music from that early period, though the majority of their material was original. There were songs that were crowd favorites such as "Close the Door and Lay Down", "Starvation" and "Underground", but often the highlight of the evening was when they did their Hendrix songs like "Voodoo Chile", "Message of Love" and "Red House" or jammed on songs like "Kansas City" with singer Jimi Quidd (later of the NY Dots) and Greek-American blues guitarist John Kronis.
Very Good Jeeves - by P G Wodehouse
I see this in politics all the time. Candidates enter politics wanting to be authentic and change things. But once the candidates enter the campaign, they stop focusing on how to be change-agents. They and their staff spend all their time focusing on beating the other guy. They hone the skills of one-upsmanship. They get engulfed in a tit-for-tat competition to win the news cycle. Instead of being new and authentic, they become artificial mirror opposites of their opponents.
so isn’t Newt Gingrich right?
"Hey."
The order structure matrix for John Carpenter’s Halloween (1978) can be seen in Figure 1, and the data can be accessed here: Nick Redfern – Halloween (1978). The data set does not include the opening or closing credits, but does include narratively relevant titles that establish time, place, and date.
I think part of the reason behind this mindset is the advancement of technology, which gives us a false sense of relationships and communication. Although we are now able to communicate more efficiently with others across the globe, this “artificial” communication has replaced real human interaction. Additionally, technology has placed enormous emphasis on speed and has pressured us to act in “real time” and not fully consider the implications of our actions.
Every time I had ever bought River Horse Hop Hazard, it has been an older bottle, and has gone a bit soft. Although liquid butterscotch doesn't sound like all that horrible a beverage, the Hop Hazard incarnation is not exactly the best way to experience such a confectionary delight. I blame the distrubutors and stores from which I had picked it up rather than the brewer themselves.
I was never the most creative Chef in the world and had to rely on certain tricks to gain some inspiration. One of them that worked best for me was to come up with a name for a dish and then try to work the dish around it.
I peered outside through the small windows. A layer of yellow crust and gray dust had taken up long term residence over the glass panes, but I could still see the early evening light. It was only seven, still a long way from darkness. But I felt the characteristic desert night chill, suddenly.
Please read them and make sure that you absolutely come to terms with forgiveness. Only those who walk this path of enlightenment can achieve sufficient mastery over the circumstances that shaped who they are and rise above them. Your mother was perfect at being exactly the person her life taught her to be. So are you. Now you are free to be the best you that you can be.
Sound:Stereo
Can I just say that I am guilty of judging LOVE & LEFTOVERS by its cover? And its title? Because, um, I am. At some point, I'd seen a summary and knew the book sounded interesting, so I signed up for the tour. But then...I forgot what it was about, so as my review date loomed closer, I kept putting off reading this because of the cover. And the title. I did the same thing last year with Stephanie Perkins' ANNA AND THE FRENCH KISS. Which, um, it turned out... I loved. LOVE & LEFTOVERS is much deeper than it appears on first glance, and I found myself engaged into the story once it got going. So I reallllllllly need to stop judging books by their covers. This was the second book I've ever read in Verse, the first being last year's AUDITION by Stasia Ward Kehoe, which I also r&r for a blog tour.
Waging a war on my insecurities
This is my first time reviewing a Goose the Market beer and cheese club offering, but I’m not stranger to pairing beer and cheese. I love washing down my nachos with a lager. And the beer and cheese crocks found at pubs are fantastic too. But the Goose beer and cheese pairing is not your standard stadium or sports bar fare. Of course, the Goose’s basement bar Enoteca is not your standard bar. I can tell you that the “Red Beer Salumi Cheese” is a fun beer concoction (beer and Hoosier Mama’s Bloody Mary Mix served on ice with meat and cheese; chorizo and provolone were the offerings this time) and the steak tartare was lovely.
In 1974 she published a book of poetry called "The Audible Silence." The couple eventually divorced in the 1980s, and among the property she gained in the settlement was the Mesa Grande ruins that scientists suspected was an ancient Hohokam temple. She eventually sold the site to city of Mesa, after obtaining promises that it planned to preserve the site as a museum.
FUJIPET 6X6 120 CAMERA
So the next time you see a book with a so-so title, don't pass it by, give it a go. You might be pleasantly surprised. Sometimes writers use up all their creativity in the writing of their books and have nothing left for the title.
"It's an employee. They get better, then they plateau. You kick them in the ass, then they get better again. Then they plateau."
I know it's almost the end of the month, but I need to tell you that quite a few of your entries have apparently not registered on Mr Linky's list this month.
The photo above is the car Ferdinand and Sophie were riding in on that fateful day; it is located at the Military Museum in Vienna.
I loved that she was willing to simply be honest and put her reaction to the book out there. For me, I'm thinking this book is kind of like trends that happen in other mediums. There's no easy or clear explanation. It just happens and something becomes wildly popular. For example, the phenom of Ugg Boots (which are not particularly attractive) or croc shoes for that matter. The youtube phenom for Randall's narration of National Geographic footage: The Crazy Nastyass Honey Badger.
The color schemes are great, vibrant colors with distinct tones to separate one object from the other without being too offensive to the eyes. Samorost 2 is truly a treat, and I suggest anyone who loves any of these games today to seriously check it out. If you’re unsure still and you want to give the game a whirl you can try out the demo – or try out the full version of it’s predecessor Samorost. It’ll truly be a surrealist gaming experience that I feel you’ll cherish in your heart for a while.
The most interesting story though involved Leslie, Irial and Niall. I don’t want to spoil it for folks but it was a rather creative ending for this trio. And if you didn’t have a good idea about the depth of love Irial and Niall held for each other — it’s very clear here. You see a different side to Niall — and one that’s not so nice.
It's basically the easiest outfit ever.
A Bonfire..
This situation is more or less inevitable given the obvious contrast between the DA-ruled Western Cape and the ANC-ruled provinces, and the similar contrast between DA-ruled Cape Town and the other ANC-ruled cities. In Johannesburg two weeks ago I realised how far the city has slipped towards the status of a Kinshasa. In a very large area of Joburg including the suburb in which I resided, there was an eighteen hour blackout - no apology, no explanation. We drove frantically for miles seeking an area where there was electricity and hot food. Dark shapes flitted in front of the car and there were no street lights.
The western suburbs of Sydney are partly known for significant Muslim communities. So to wedge away the footy allegiance many Muslim 'Westies' have towards the Canterbury Bankstown Bulldogs of the NRL, the AFL is utilizing community ambassadors and trading in on the AFL's unique status as the football code with the greatest number of women members - close to 50%, compared to below 40% for the NRL. As an Australia-only sport, the AFL is perhaps more anxious about its viability than a rugby code that has many other countries playing its version of football. So the AFL's calculation that it needs women to maintain viability is an interesting extension on what Salaam Rugby and Salaam Dunk reveal - women need sport as much as sport needs women. Although Nasva Bahfren's radio documentary on this effort by the AFL for the Australian Broadcasting Corporation is excellent and needs no remake, if someone makes a film documentary about the Auburn Tigers women, I bet they'll call it Salaam Footy.
"TrkRTrt2" cut at 1.75 inches with the Phrase function selected.
In short, despite the rain it’s still important to save water.
My point: We all make mistakes. I have personally sat on the Queen of Mistake’s throne just recently myself…so, my compassion level was…well, HIGH.
These pieces were just tooooooooo special and go so perfectly with this photo!
. Caring about appearances or having high quality or fancy clothing was perceived as anti-revolutionary and were part of the bourgeois. Applying labels to others based on clothing and accessories became the norm in China during the Cultural Revolution. Because this mindset discouraged individuality, several groups arose in order to promote collectivity, these groups included the military of course, the Educated Youth and the Red Guards. The Mao suit was popular among each of these groups, but each group altered the uniform slightly in order to set themselves apart.
I have lived on four continents now. I have lived through Presidential elections on all four. Yesterday was election day here in Cameroon.
We hope that you will enjoy the documentary.
21.27. Every single night at this time, I think, “tomorrow will be different”, but not like before. I’m not thinking, “tomorrow I will restrict further” or “tomorrow I wont eat anything”, I think, “tomorrow I will eat more normal”.
02/08/91
I think this is relevant. Because if i were a terrorist, i wouldn’t necessarily do the SAME things every time. In fact, doing different things seems like its much more in tune with modern terroristing. Now one thing i’d dearly love is my own portable missile launcher in the heart of London.
On Tuesday night, I went to bed to find SwingBot lying on my side of the bed. He explained that he was warming it for me, but since he was there anyway…
“Changing the diaper while texting does not mix well”
If you're one of those kind of people that likes to put on trance inducing drone out music before bed time Sex Church MIGHT be up your alley. Might spelled in all caps though because if you find some certain types of that kind of music give you really messed up dreams where you end up feeling somewhat disturbed the rest of the day because of what you saw in your sleep-Growing Over is probably not the album you're going to want to put on before entering slumberland.
Enjoy your Wednesday :)
The most recent news from Raider International Publishing is their recruitment of additional staff to their New York offices and the continuing innovation in ideas and marketing they demonstrate. They have continued to develop their Raider Broadcasting Network with podcasts of new release books, also their Writers Forum show, an online and print magazine, and their latest venture; a bona-fide retail outlet for Raider titles. Their CEO Adam Salviani and team assures that further details and developments will come in the new year.
WORDS: The Voynich manuscript. Exact origins and authorship unknown.
Welcome to Helena, Tx., “The Toughest Town on Earth.”
So, I thought it would be pretty funny to put these subjects into a picture book. And based on my Mom's reaction when she opened it...well, I couldn't have asked for better. I figured I'd put it out for sale in hopes to get many others to have the same reaction. I hope they think it's funny too.
for the grans? They will have quite the collection someday.
When I asked Andrea Roberts what suggestions she had for saving Peter, her words cut me to the heart...
The 'optional challenges' I have listed on the Challenge Blog are indeed very popular and they are helping me very much at the moment, as I have a lot of family commitments. I really appreciate all the hard work that has gone into yet another gorgeous Blanket jenniferanne. I am most grateful to you and I know that this Blanket will be received so warmly in a few months time when I go out once again to the Nursing Homes.
The holiday season brings some of the oddest situations and guests, and the cheapest and the most generous tippers to the restaurant. Last year, on Christmas Eve, I had a woman tell me she was ready to kill herself or her entire family because they were driving her crazy. She said this in front of her family. It was awkward, to say the least. Then, we served raw chicken fingers to her kids. *sigh*
As odd as this might sound, I'm going to say my children. Being a young mother, I was somewhat forced to become responsible and selfless. They made my life matter and focused my attention on something much bigger. They have shown me what is important in life and have taught me not to take a single day for granted. I hope to be the type of person who is fun-loving and easy going--just like my kids.
Australia is very young, European-wise, at least,
Guess who was dripping sweat afterwards? This girl. :P
and it hurts and is difficult. And you want to speak
Because my life feels so busy, I had to cut back on my blogging frequency here at Speed of Light. Twice a month feels about right now. Just like when you are employed, even in retirement, life is a balancing act. I wish I could find more time to really commune with nature, especially rivers and oceans. My husband and I own a canoe that we hope to launch next month. Right now my best connection with nature comes through backyard gardening. We have Juliet, Yellow Pear and Homestead tomatoes coming in. There is always plenty to do in the yard, but I would love to see more of the American West. Someday I hope to cross all 50 states off my lifetime travel list. I also have hopes of becoming a labyrinth facilitator when I can afford the time and money to enroll in a Veriditas training course. For all my hopes and blessings, I am grateful. Staying fit is very important, as are friends, intellectual activities and so-called "down time", a commodity I always seem to be short of. And so it goes... L'chaim!
Khattak assured that he would raise the issue of bodies in parliament, however, the judiciary should also take notice of the incidents.
it has been ages since i came to these pages.
for the glaze:
So, do not look for headline news, look to the shifts of hearts, of massive shifts in where people — groups, individuals — are coming from.
(The recipe includes my revisions)
And then I got the coffee maker text. And finally, on Sunday:
So... back to the garden. I wish I could take credit for this but it's really my mom. She doesn't know it, but she's a green witch. If you put a garlic clove in her hand it will begin to sprout. I can take credit for the compost though, and I did help plant the seeds. However, I'm not the ones keeping them alive. Tonight I made a salad from the lettuce in the garden. It's important to clean the leaves very carefully, as there are slugs and other critters. I mixed the greens with feta cheese, red chili powder, and an ripe, juicy peach. The peach tastes just like summer to me. Mixed with some balsamic vinegar and olive oil, a little salt, and it was juuuuuuuuuust right.
I am in love with simplicity and class. This ring screams both of those for me. I don’t need an expensive ring to show how much the love of my life loves me. I would rather all that extra money be spent on a vacation or anything else that we can both share together. Or why can’t we just save all that money? I don’t even need an extravagant wedding either. I know every girl desires a huge wedding, but I honestly don’t. I would be happy with running off together to the courthouse to get married, followed by a get-together with all of our family and closest friends. That to me is love – being so excited to be forever theirs that you run off together because it really is all for you two and not everyone else.
High acid and freshness in the mouth with light melon, tinned peach and poached pear.
A blessed first Sunday in Advent to you! Welcome to Stampin' Sisters in Christ, where our challenges are inspired by scripture. We pray you will be blessed by your fellowship with us, as we are blessed by yours!
she's golden rule, teaches school,
Cetaphil is an amazing product. Our family has been using it for the longest time. It is not sudsy like ordinary soap which makes it very easy to rinse. You will not spend a lot of time just to remove that slippery feeling when using soaps. After you dry with a face towel, you will feel the difference on your skin. Oil is gone without you face feeling stretch dry. It is very gentle it was recommended before by my wife’s derma for one of my sons when he had a skin problem. It does work as a shaving lubricant too.
It is easy enough to purify clear water. The solar water disinfection method, or SODIS, calls for leaving a transparent plastic bottle of clear water out in the sun for six hours. That allows heat and ultraviolet radiation to wipe out most pathogens that cause diarrhea, a malady that kills 4,000 children a day in Africa.
It's shelf date is to end on March 6. It was worth every penny I paid.
you are too tired to hold me like you mean it.
Since we now have an additional three taps at the brewery tasting room we're able to pour more seasonal beers and play around with extra-small batch projects. The first few of these were the Anglo-Saison, the Scottish Six and the De Ill Ganumberg, all of which were variations of year-round beers brewed with different yeasts and made only in five gallon batches.
20. Marine - A Man and A Woman
Guadarrama had reportedly tied string around his ankles to stop the bottles slipping out.
What seems odd is that only the handsomest, most healthy looking young men appear to be in need of Cialis or Viagra, and only the most alluring, sexy and healthy looking young females have genital herpes, regularly using STD meds.
It is the sad paradox of abuse that the majority of abused people truly struggle to confront their attacker. As the abuse continues and the self-worth and confidence of the abused person whittles away, it becomes harder and harder for the abused person to stick up for themselves and extricate themselves from the situation. As sad as this is when the abused person is an adult, at least an adult ostensibly has some degree of life perspective to be able to recognize that there is a better way to live. At least an adult might have a network of people willing to help, or at least know that there are resources available to help get them to a better place physically and emotionally. At least an adult may have a job or access to money, making their ability to leave that much more realistic. At least an adult, in many circumstances, has at least a few other options.
It's been two very long, overly productive days, but we're here and we're settling in. Yesterday morning began at 7:01 a.m. when 6 movers arrived at our door. We gave them a walk through and they jumped into the packing. Landon came downstairs around 7:30 and we found him silently standing on the landing of the stairs, clutching a stuffed duck and looking at boxes and paper and tape and strange men, with a complete expressionless face. I have no idea what was going on in his head. We shuffled him back to his room to change into clothes and let another mover get in to pack up his furniture and closet. I finally woke Claire up a few minutes later because they needed to get into her room. She was displeased, but when I got her downstairs she yelled out some cheerful "HI!!!!!"s and then went to the garage to sit on Natalie's extra set of car seats for a while. I think they wanted to make sure they'd be packed into the van with the rest of our stuff.
That will be almost like a heavy 'High Tea' or a heavy 'SunQuick' time eh? Mak isah prefers it simple.
My question is this: At what age do children stop having the NEED for every thought they have to escape from their lips and stay in their heads?
Mayall: He didn’t get blown up in the oven like that.
Is to live in a state of Unity
There will be further journeys from brain to bookshelf, but there will never be another 'first' journey. You have been such an important part of this first journey. I hope you like what I said on the acknowledgements page. Please pop across to my author site and check out Palaces & Calluses if you haven't done so yet.
Here is the butterfly brooch on a cushion I made for my eldest. She is off ill today (though you wouldn't know it... she's plagued me non stop!) and helped me open the little parcels. Anyway she loves this so it's going to take turns with the usual crochet corsage on the cushion.
He has helped his servant Israel,
So, how do you get back into writing after a long holiday or time off?
Good quality Extra Virgin Olive Oil
It's windy.
When he went for her swamwar (where a woman is allowed to choose her husband, yes it was very liberating experience back then in ancient India too), where Pandav were dressed as Brahmins or Priests. She insulted him by calling him a mere son of a charioteer who DARED to think of marrying a princess, being true to her egoistic nature (after all she considered herself to be very EDUCATED and she believed that she knew everything about karna, another case where her arrogance was at best, as in reality karna was of Royal Blood and eldest brother of 5 Pandav, so in short was the perfect husband for her, Krishna here too played his spoiler game by misguiding Draupadi)
recipes, but you can use Ivory, Sunlight, Kirk's Hardwater Castile or Zote bars. Don't use heavily perfumed soaps. We buy Fels-Naptha by the case from our local grocer or online. Washing Soda and Borax can often be found on the laundry or cleaning aisle. Recipe cost approx. $2 per batch.
David Brumer
Term insurance is less expensive than permanent insurance only when considering the out-of-pocket premium payments, says Mike Roscoe, senior vice president of innovation and actuary at The Hartford. For a long-term perspective, certain permanent insurance products can be much less expensive than term.
TOY WC, JANOSKY JE, LAIRD SB. Influenza immunization of medical residents: knowledge, attitudes, and behaviors. Am J Infect Control 2005; 33: 473-475.
These are just a few of the reasons why I have decided to donate proceeds from my sports camp manual. If you have been wanting to purchase one, now is the time. Spread the word!!
In the emotional video above (which has more than two million views on YouTube) we see reception therapist Yvonne Russell fitting him into an iPod loaded with music from his own era. Like flipping a switch, Henry comes back to life.
They eventually enter the blue cloud. It takes nearly five minutes of nothing but a blue laser light show. It is only broken up by panning shots of the crew’s faces. It often looks like they are about to say something, but they never do. They are just watching the light show like we are. They could have panned the camera around the theater audience and gotten the same result.
Musician & Spouse – Barbara Bach
With my guests leaving early this morning, I had limited time for my morning drive. Because of my time limit, I knew I could not travel too far and so therefore decided to take a relaxed drive stopping at birds and bugs. We rounded a corner and found Herold with a small herd of giraffe. We sat with them for a while and watched as a young female suckled from her mother. It was a beautiful
I will embrace it.
Well that was thoroughly unnecessary. But I thought I’d share. And I suppose since this is my first post, I’ll give a short introduction to what I’m doing with my life and why I would even consider assuming a blog is a good idea.
So, I guess this is a disclaimer. It is not my intention to offend, only to amuse and illuminate. Please don’t read much further if you are likely to descend into a rabid furor of outrage. Actually, please feel free. You will probably find it a cleansing experience.
Wichita Kansas
Place flour and salt in a mixing bowl.
The second one was brought in (my turn). She was calm. Haggard-looking. Started whining that it was the other girl who hit her first that her tooth became loose. She lifted her upper lip and started pushing the only 2 teeth remaining on the upper gum. One was swaying back and forth. I asked if she had a history of using illegal drugs. She admitted that she did. Heavily. I told the deputy that there were very minor scratches on her right wrist and left side of her nose. I wouldn’t consider the loose tooth as injury.
Set Limits
1 sisters
Equally important is the ‘installation stiffness’ of the system, that is the flexibility of any components, especially the flexible fluid lines, as this will alter the systems response.
Season the zucchini, yellow squash, eggplant and onions with salt and pepper, and then toss or brush thoroughly with olive oil before preparing grill.
Bottom line: if you have to take a vacation day to attend the General Strike-it’s not a General Strike. If you ride the BART train or AC transit bus to the General Strike and the fares are being collected it is not a general strike? Despite the inability of organized labor to launch a General Strike they were able to provide many of the amenities necessary for a Day of Action. OEA paid for the toilets and the Alameda Labor Council paid for a lunch for all while union member volunteers cooked and served. But when it came time to shut down the port it was the Oakland rank and file working class not the labor tops who took the lead!
Two vacationing couples who witness a satanic sacrifice suddenly find their lives threatened.
Many apologies to those of you who follow and like the daily verse…yesterday was full of craziness and was not able to get on to do it. I am beginning a new individual study today, though, and am going to post verses from that…likely without pictures this time…so here is the first one…
And if she does beat Couric in the ratings for one day, every right-wing media outlet will shout SUCK IT LIBRULS!! in one voice.
Im so grateful your my sister!
NA: Does your guitar have a name?
The suffragists included two African-American Republican women who were also co-founders of the NAACP: Ida Wells and Mary Terrell, great leaders of our party, both of them.
Even though all I want to do is sew and play with my new sewing machine, I'm afraid I will have to devote several evenings this week to tackling some much-needed yard work. Oh well, guess we can't sew all the time.
Hopefully I'll see you again soon... but, uh, I've used up my backlog of sodas!!
Have a great day! (and be nice to the Earth or you might end up fat, dependent on technology, and at the mercy of a giant megacorporation bent on world domination through consumerism...)
i will even put on pants now
Holly Golightly: No. The blues are because you're getting fat, and maybe it's been raining too long. You're just sad, that's all. The mean reds are horrible. Suddenly you're afraid, and you don't know what you're afraid of. Do you ever get that feeling?
and place our trust
** Leaving aside, of course, those reviews when it’s obvious the book has not been read. “I didn’t like this book because the cover was too orange.”
“That’s not Coercion and you know it,” Pollack’s voice rumbled until Rel was sure he could hear it in his own gut. Or maybe that was just the nagging suspicion he’d messed things up. He should have stepped in by now, surely? What could he have done?
It has been a fun learning week! My tot is starting to problem solve very creatively and talk some more (can you see my happy dance over the Internet?) Here was the conversation between Nicholas and his Papa last night.
Jacob: It only ends once. Anything that happens before that, it’s just progress.
Ok, so who's in?
These guys are back with a new single, BUT why do they use foreigner as the model. Looks awkward, really awkward. The the concept is blurring, whether they’re gonna save the girl or being deceived by the girl-like Shinee-Juliette Japan Ver. And then honestly their dance are stiff.
It vowed to continue hacking the sites until the Lebanese people earn the rights they are asking for and until living standards are improved.
Taking our country over and dying for Allah is in your indoctrinated delusional belief system because your false prophet Mohamed laid it down in the manual (the Koran) of your death cult Islam when the devil birthed his lie into our world many centuries ago. There are many of us who are now rising up, who are well aware of you, your evil and your warmongering murderous Islamic aims and intentions aimed at us and our children. You and your Al Qaeda leaders are the ones who have forced us into the position we are now in, in which we clearly have only two choices to decide from; we either continue saying nothing and sit back, talking, watching and accept the eventual Islamification of our Nation and destruction of our children’s futures or we stand up and stamp out your Islamic inspired, Al Qaeda led Jihad against us, our British homeland and our children’s futures.
Chatham House is “the home of the Royal Institute of International Affairs for over eight decades.” Dr. Cornish’s resume is no less impressive:
It's funny that someone recently identified one of your photos Madame, as a shot of the inimitable Miss Marple. Because I, like old Jane Marple, am driven by wanting to solve the mysteries of life. Luckily I've not stumbled across any murders as yet, but I am forever trying to work out why the world is how it is. Especially the world of gender and sex, as it seems so confusing and not working in many people's interests. My philosophy on sex these days, is that sex probably doesn't go very well with philosophy. Foucault may differ with me there, but I think all that physical activity, and needing to be wanted, takes away from one's brainpower!
It seems that in those days the Driskill was quite the home away from home for short-tempered soreheads. Once, Chief Justice Reuben Gaines of the State Supreme Court was hosting a formal dinner in the ballroom. A lady came in late, so Gaines politely rose from his seat. A waiter assumed Gaines had gotten up to carve the turkey, so he pulled the Judge’s chair out a little more to give him extra room.
► This year I'm planning on saving my seeds and using them next year.
John said that, as a child psychologist himself, he was very taken with what he believed was James's questioning of the concepts of good and evil and what he saw as James's overturning of the simplistic pretty=good and ugly=bad associations one finds in novelists like Dickens. At the start of her employment, the governess sees the pretty children as utterly pure, but right from the beginning we have to question her view as unreliable: they have been orphaned, they have been more or less abandoned by their guardian, and the boy, it turns out, has just been expelled from school, yet she expresses the judgement that they have been untouched by unhappiness. This is only thrown into an ironic light when she later comes to see them as communing with the 'ghosts' and indeed, deceitful and touched by evil themselves. Everyone agreed with John that as the story progresses the governess's perceptions become less and less reliable, culminating perhaps in the moment when she reports to Mrs Grose the housekeeper that the 'ghost' of the dead governess Miss Jessel spoke to her, completely contradicting the earlier blow-by-blow account in her narration of the encounter with the ghost. Her perceptions are extreme, unsubtle, wildly reversed and, with a close reading of the text, unsubstantiated, often because of unfinished sentences when she interrupts, or fails to challenge when others - chiefly Mrs Grose or Miles the boy - break off speaking, seemingly eager to jump to her own conclusions. Finally she tips into a kind of illogical madness: all appearances of innocence must be fraudulent and therefore indicate the presence of evil.
Fold the top edge down to meet the bottom edge. Crease and unfold.
Lee explores the Indian prejudice and bigotry with regards to philandering men and divorce with a light touch. She manages to turn an otherwise serious situation into an occasion for laughter. She makes you cry. She gives you hope. And reminds you that second chances really do exist. I enjoyed the trip thoroughly.
We get news that the priority people are all done, and now they’ll letting us normos in. Us civilians, us stupid people for standing in the cold rain for two hours. I can’t feel my feet.
These are the nominated films for Best Picture...The King's Speech, Black Swan, The Fighter, Inception, The Kids Are All Right, 127 Hours, The Social Network, Toy Story 3, True Grit and Winter's Bone.
Before our actual flight, the Youth Ambassadors as well as their instructor did a live demo for us...
From staff the most common answers received were:
The verdict will follow...
I am one broke, but very happy girl today !
15 Rock n Roll Suicide
This graph shows the price to rent ratio (January 1998 = 1.0).
I usually love lots of layers, but I am quickly finding that I love the CAS style too! I started with a Kraft card base, inking the edges with CTMH white daisy ink, and dded my snowflakes. A little bling and this simple sentiment complete this CAS beauty!
Maybe if sex weren’t the end all be all of our society the doubtless innocent repetition of idiotic lyrics wouldn’t have become an issue at all.
It’s important to note that for a true Pin-Up look, a semi-matte finish is needed for the foundation. Followed by a setting of loose powder. In the era of the pin-up most foundations had a semi-matte or matte look to them.
Beer should be for the rest of us: affordable, easy to enjoy, thirst slaking and confidence restoring.”Read the piece here.
QUARTERLY REPORT ON THE SPANISH ECONOMY
Please feel free to comment and add to the list.
So, I made the table and Catherine painted it.
juice of 2 lemons
Grab hold of all that God offers You. You’ll discover that He has a plan and a destiny for every child.
We hope that everyone has had a WONDERFUL 8 months of the year and are ready for the last couple of months left of 2010!!! As for us, well, it has been DEFINETLY an UP and DOWN kind of year. So much has happened in the last 8 months that sometimes I am just in awe of what has gone on!! J I haven’t give anyone on update in a VERY long time so I thought I would go ahead and get one out…
So what are you waiting for?
In terms of the future, Visser and Cisarik have a fairly clear path ahead of them.
The Guardian UK reports: “Barack Obama has declared that his goal of defeating al-Qaida is within reach and that the withdrawal of US forces from Afghanistan would free up money to help rebuild the US economy.”
By now, Portland readers have probably heard quite a bit about the controversy surrounding TriMet's sudden decision to eliminate the NW Thurman branch of the 15-Belmont/NW 23rd line, due to stated safety concerns. Residents along the affected stretch of Thurman are understandably upset about no more bus service (for some, the cancellation means a 3/4 mile hike to the nearest bus); and some have suggested that this is little more than a PR move, not a legit safety issue--as busses have been running this route for a long time without any major incidents.
To cut a long story short, ‘helping out’ grew into assembling and contacting the Voting Panel, crafting the voting criteria and then editing, contributing, proof reading and writing the introduction, the conclusion, the bits in between and then the Media Releases. That’ll teach me to agree on the fee before sussing out the work required!
Boutwell met Morton outside the front door and, in front of everyone, bluntly told him Christine Morton was dead, murdered in their bedroom. Morton reeled.
He told them that you cannot judge a tree, or a person, by only one season, and that the essence of who they are and the pleasure, joy, and love that come from that life can only be measured at the end, when all the seasons are up.
(a) Wet hands (water is best) and add a drop of nontoxic soap.
Check out the comments on my last post, particularly the one from Karen Martin Sampson. Her words and thoughts are very spot on and every point she made is one I made myself before posting that piece. In fact, that is why I almost didn't post it. My oldest daughter Jessie made the same observation about the darks in the trees and I did attempt to darken it in spots and found myself looking at trees and trying to determine the real colors of those dark spaces.
-You laugh all the time at the silliest things!
I haven’t shopped like Bean and I shopped on Saturday in a long time. We left the house at 12 and didn’t get home until 7:30. We made a pact before we ever left the house that this shopping trip was not going to end in tears, temper tantrums, or grumpy moods. There were a few times that I thought we might be at risk for breaking our promise but we came out of each shop just fine and pretty happy despite our disappointments.
You’ll feel more grounded, balanced, and centered. You’ll come to work with greater purpose and passion. And you’ll have more to show for your efforts at the end of each year. This is pretty important in demonstrating the value and worth of your team as leader.
How are you going to use the $17,500 you won?
Yorker magazine. My God! What would they
Remove from oven, and while cake is still hot pour Hot Rum Glaze over cake. Leave in pan for 30 minutes.
The pleasure is when you wave to village kids and they wave back.
Yes, I know that Cele made a big boobu when he called the honeymoon-suspect, Shrien Dewan, a baboon, and his foolish remark will probably wreck the case, and that he probably was not thinking straight either when he authorised a R500m lease, these actions exemplify the type of individual the communists want in managerial positions. They don’t need people who can think straight!
Stephen Wheeler — Associate Professor of Landscape Architecture
The pictures in my mind, I want them more and more and more
Due to the popularity of his styles, he was described as “a rock star, an artist, and a craftsman who ‘changed the world with a pair of scissors.’” His “wash and wear” philosophy liberated women from the “tyranny of the salon” and “revolutionized the art of hairstyling.” Sassoon’s styles became “emblematic of freedom and good health,” and their popularity allowed him to open the first chain of worldwide hair styling salons, complemented by his hair-treatment products. He is also remembered for his television commercials in the 1980s. Vidal Sassoon: The Movie, a documentary film about his life, was released in 2010
John 1:1-5
His fellow emobrood critterlings seem to like him well enough, though, and even Daddy Lich King seems like he might give Sendoku a hug someday.
Then, within minutes after the boat harbor, you come down off the wall to the Merwede River where the water taxis are ready to take students, workers, and visitors from one city to the next.
Here are some great sample pages from the Spring 2011 issue of Creative Steps:
The woman escaped March 13 while Wilson was sleeping and ran to a nearby fire station for help, according to the sheriff’s office. Evidence found at Wilson’s home supports the woman’s story, Herrin said.
- My wife says: I’ve still no idea what is going on.
I absolutely love nature, and some of my favorite times in nature are when I actually come in contact with wildlife. Here is a list of my top 10 most memorable wildlife encounters, sort of in descending order.
Robbie told me he and his relative CB were surprised when they found out that a good number of MDs in Saturn were already fathers and/or husbands (common law or otherwise). Robbie said that he doesn’t believe a man with a family should continue to work as an MD. Robbie believes working as an MD is a meantime job and is best left to single young men such as himself and his relative CB.
The first time a quarterback won the OPOY and did NOT win the MVP was 1982 and that was one of the strangest decisions in the history of of any award. Dan Fouts won the OPOY. Fair. He led the NFL in passing yards and touchdowns. But the MVP was … kicker Mark Moseley. The writers really decided that a kicker -- A FREAKING KICKER -- was the Most Valuable Player in the entire NFL.*
Click on the title to go over and have a look at it for yourself. If you pick up a copy, I’d love to hear your thoughts on my thoughts.
From this perspective dharma can be seen as balance and adharma as imbalance. Then we understand that Krishna so creates himself as to correct imbalances amd restore a balance. (re. gita).
The one bummer was that I had to have a blood draw done before the non-stress test (just to double check my iron levels) AND David couldn't be there for the blood draw part of it (but would be able to meet me for the NST). Rather than reschedule the blood draw for another day, I decided to buck up and just get it done on my own (so brave, right?).
When I got home yesterday afternoon from the doctors, I heard a Baltimore Orioles sweet calls. I had been hearing the Orioles for about a week, but hadn't seen them. I was standing at the kitchen door, and just happen to catch a flash of black and orange as an oriole landed on the big cherry tree in the side yard. By the time I grabbed my camera, zoomed in on the bird at the top of the tree, I was only able to get one quick picture before it flew off. I am hoping to getter a better photo next time I see the bird.
Fallenwood.” Then a fierce roaring laugh erupted from the stone, as though the dragon thought the new
Anon: “You cannot play with pee, you cannot take pee to the park and you certainly cannot put a hat on pee. On a pea, maybe, but not on pee.”
b) Call your boyfriend.
Firstly, I define having a short amount of playtime as being under two hours a day. Previously there were more dungeons and raids that could be completed in that amount of time, but with Cataclysm we’ve seen a shift to slightly longer time invested in those. The fastest random heroic that I’ve done was around 45 minutes, which falls into this time allotment, but that will be another post.
If you are still unsure, we have plenty of pattern suggestions in the shop. So drop by because all you need is a few hours over a few days to start - & finish - all of your gift knitting! Looking forward to seeing you! Happy Holidays!
I know I can't turn back the clock or stop time, but if products are available that help slow it down, I'm game! How are you dealing with the changing face in the mirror? What does "aging gracefully" mean to you? Let me know in the comments and you could win a Darphin Gift Basket (valued at a minimum of $100!)
What if I can’t save this world?
Smiths Bigmouth strikes again UK
We went to a creche (a showing of nativities from all over the world) a few weeks ago. We had a great time looking at the beautiful- AMAZING displays of nativities and then spent time doing crafts and games. One thing I didn't expect was that I would be dressing up as Mary before the night was through. But I guess that's what happens when you have a 4 year old. Zorro saw the people dressing up and getting photos taken and wanted to join in. We completely encouraged it until we realized that he wanted us to be a part of that photo too. Well, I wasn't about to spoil that moment for him so I let them dress me and D let them dress him- OMG I can't believe D let them dress him!!!- and we set out to be Mary, Joseph and a Shepherd. The shepherd insisted I hold the "baby Jesus" doll.
Mix well and cook for a few seconds.
...he's afraid of the vacuum cleaner now, yet sprints over to it when it's on as fast as he can, because that is where i am.
But I am being far too critical of The Guard. It is a very enjoyable small-scale film – and very funny – though I think it has been damaged by trying to make it more commercial.
- Iggy Pop - The Idiot and Lust For Life with the line-up combined from both those original tours. Iggy would have to get his hair cut though!
There was no need to ask why. Several members of the Crimean War Research Society had already asked ‘Are you writing a romance?’, and I somehow don’t believe they’d have put the same question to a man. Yet before I start ranting about sexism, there’s actually good statistical foundation for these assumptions. If you browse the authors in the Historical Novel Society, there’s no doubt ‘romances’ are written overwhelmingly by women, while ‘action and military’ are very firmly the province of men. There are exceptions, of course, and writers like Robyn Young, Philippa Gregory and M.C. Scott have all proved women can more than hold their own in a military world, but in general there’s a truth to the expectation that women don’t write war. What I want to know is – why?
A new month has arrived and it is actually my favorite month of the year. I love pink, hearts and fast things. For some reason, having 1-2 less days in a month makes it fly by. I am going to be starting a new monthly post on my blog. Goals for the month. Each month I always make some personal goals, but I never share them with anyone, so this month and the ones to follow, I am going to share them with you. Then I can look back and see what I accomplished.
Excited to celebrate a new day in blogging, this is the recipe I chose.
I know, I’m just irritated at the moment, but I can’t really help it. I feel as if I’m going to be on the computer a lot less this week… My body’s been feeling sickly.
Why the Gunpowder Treason
Sen. Jim Inhofe, R-Okla., a senior member of the Senate Armed Services Committee, called the president’s victory lap in Afghanistan on the anniversary of the death of Osama bin Laden at the hands of the Navy SEALs “an attempt to shore up his national security credentials, because he has spent the past three years gutting our military.”
I love this story! I think I will make this the motto for my life. Whenever troubles come my way, like the dirt being tossed onto the old mule, I will shake them off and step up! The Bible has many things to say about adversity in our lives and our response to it. Here are just a few of those verses:
1)Where would they go for their first date?
I actually wanted to post a foto of myself wearing the business costume for the interview, but decided to spare you that look, lol. The pencil skirt I wore was extremly uncomfortable, and it made me look bigger than I really am... But I pretty much liked the blazer. Ahh, who would've thought I would work at the airport! I applied most for "normal" office jobs, but then got the postive answer from the least expected one. I guess luck was by my side that day.
Joe Bushkin, who passed away in November 2004, was a legend in his time. A pianist, composer, arranger and vocalist of superb talents and impeccable taste. A professional for over 70 years, he started at age 15 playing gigs with Benny Goodman, Bunny Berigan and Eddie Condon.
Or you can add designs from other cartridges, whatever you want.
924 ***D-I/16/1986. “Article II, Sections 2, 3 and 4 of the Constitution of 1787.” Gannett Lecture Series, Rochester Institute of Technology, Rochester, New York. (Incorporated in Item C-1986(6), above, and in Item B-4, above, pp. 109-23, 315-19 (1989).)
Rather than start baking early on the morning of your playdate, just plan a quick trip to the grocery store to stock up on allergy-friendly food items. Find out if your child’s friend has more than one allergy, then pick up a few items that cover all the bases. Some easy snack items include:
2. It is also well established by case law that the more a shape TM resembles the actual shape of the goods the more difficult it is to establish its distinctive character under Art 7(1)(b) CTMR (Mag).
I'm not going to say this campaign makes me want to go register for a card but I am impressed at how subtle and classy the brand goes about with its digital promotion. If film making isn't your thing, you can visit other channels sponsored by American Express. Less focus on the brand and more on the individuals who just might register for it...that's what I'm talking about.
Only submissions emailed to this address will be considered.
The mouthfeel is full and filling, but not quite chewy. Not rough, but not smooth either.
Put your money down
Any way here goes…
But then again, why think of uncertainty when what we have is SURE, also in so MANY ASPECTS.
Chef Terrance Brennan’s Picholine is considered not only one of the best vegetarian restaurants in New York, but one of the best restaurants, period. It gets one Michelin star and three stars from the New York Times, though I think it deserves higher: the meal I had there recently was the best meal I’ve had in a long time (probably since Eleven Madison Park).
I roll my eyes whenever the talking-heads on television debate these issues as each side blames the other for how bad things are. I am constantly amazed at how short sighted the American public is when it comes to these issues. They have been ongoing since the 1960s and only appear to get worse with each successive fix of the problem. It appears to me that the Democrats and Republicans are constantly arguing over how best to form the bucket line and bail water on the Titanic. One bucket line might work better than the other, but the end result is inevitable, the ship is still going to sink.
Have a lot more energy today though and can still feel the release. Its nice
You have kids and you are forever surrounded by love. The day to day turmoil of life may not feel like love, but love it is.
In honor of the big game and all the coinciding parties, I'm going to post some ideas for food and snacks to make your bash a huge success. It seems like most parties have chili and appetizers, so I have some of those as well as some other ideas. I only included one cookie, my favorite, but any cookie would be great for a party since most recipes make a lot and are easy to pick up during breaks. (The numbers in the collage correspond with the link to the recipe below)
Erica's post about linen shirts - which can be alluringly crumpled, easy and chic - inspired my recent trip to the Cambodia tailor. Linen is one of the most breathable fabrics out there, and it tends to get softer with each washing. Plus, it is quite substantial, so it can take the wear that Cambodia dishes out. (My clothes are taking a beating here.) I don't know why I was never a fan of linen before.
M: "Penguins! They are cute! I don't think most birds are necessarily cute but Penguins are...oh and Kakapos! They look like cute little old men."
Celebrities lose weight because they get paid for their looks and to maintain their looks. They will have all the support they need; be it pills, trainers, equipments. The media always keeps checking them and bash them whenever they look out of shape so it’s their job to look good most of the time. Media will praise them if they did well and bash them if they failed along their way to weightloss.
Young people are interested, as we all are, in the big questions of life – who and what we are, what it means to be a human. Because of his interest in the “big questions”, Kevin has often been accused of posing more questions than answering them but believes that it’s the journey, rather than answers per se, that is of interest,.
In a monogamous relationship, it's natural for a woman to want to see a little (or, umm, a lot?) of the unrestricted male. I don't mean violence, of course. That's where trust comes in. But for everyone's benefit, raising the gate on a few more basic instincts leads to a happier experience. How many times have I heard women ask:
Section 91.101 of the Louisville/Jefferson County Metro Government code of Ordinances is declared unconstitutional insofar as it threatens to deprive pet owners of their property rights without a finding of guilt...Metro is hereby enjoined from enforcing 91.101 in the manner just described.Forfeiture/Seizure Bonds Are Unconstitutional
By Ralph Nader
We slept well that night, very well.
Here is the text of the email.
The first beers to arrive will be:
So please spread the word about May 21. The idea is to get our kids to a local park, so they can meet other local kids, at about 10 in the morning. That way, instead of me bringing my kids at 11 and you bringing yours at 3, they won’t miss each other.
**If you have any yogurt making problems, see the links below for what I've tried.
Music does that. After watching a movie marathon for a weekend, I’ll start to imagine my own life with a soundtrack, since nothing ever happens in a movie without music to go along with it. Have you ever just been walking along the sidewalk and a shiver runs up your spine, because you feel like there should be creepy music playing? Or perhaps you’re not so morbid, and you hear an upbeat guitar during the happier parts of your life.
Can you blame them? They are seventeen years old (sometimes I forgot they were that young) and they are being forced into engagements and boring, quiet lives where women are to be seen and not heard. It's not hard to imagine their wanting more from life.Oh, what a tangled and dangerous path they end up taking to get a taste of this unattainable life.
Most American readers will be familiar with the Islamic charity known as the Holy Land Foundation, whose directors were convicted on one hundred and eight charges of terrorism financing in November 2008.
When it is only one or two items from a package-deal, it has to be send back in a huge box, costing return postage, which you as customer strangely enough have to pay for yourself once more. (For me, the closest post-office is 5.6 km from my home. The delivering company is about 19 km from my living quarters) In case you do not send it registered, you have the chance that Pixmania says you never returned it to them. So to make sure they can not deny you sending it back it will cost you again some bit.
I happened to find a seat beside Sister Kevin. I greeted her and sat down. I told myself if I could just rest my knee and concentrate on my breathing, the pain would be bearable. I started reflecting on how God probably wanted to tell me something. Maybe God wanted me to make changes to my life as to correspond better with my aging body. What changes to my life should I make? What sort of changes did God actually want me to do?
Infinite:
Since starting my walk with Jesus, whether spiritually or physically (or both), I know that I can’t exactly stop and expect to continue the same level of relationship as when I walk with Him daily. Wait, back up… I’m not saying that I want to stop. Let’s make sure that’s not what I’m implying. I’m just saying that now that I’ve started this walk with Him, there is no stopping. I can’t imagine my day without that deliberate time to spend with Him. Who would I give my troubles to? How would I get through the rest of the teenage years with my daughter without His guidance? Who would comfort my heart when it’s hurting? Who else would listen to my incessant rambling without interrupting and just let me get it all out and still be there waiting for me every day to do it all over again?
Sentiment - Whimsy Stamps Ticket Sentiment stamped in Wild Wasabi Ink
Liz sent low sugar mixed berry, and pluot.
Summer Kay and Ricky Leo were married April 30 th, 1923, in a simple ceremony at The First Baptist Church on Loathsome Creek. It’s been said the it was a festive event. Friends and family populated the Creek with love and laughter. Summer and Ricky were very much in love. The young couple had big plans for a huge family and a long life together. Prior to the wedding, Ricky and his four brother, Ellis Jean, Adam Donald, Silvester Joe, and John Jill had been working for weeks to prepare for the planting season. Plowing the eight arches of land their father had given Ricky as a wedding gift, the brothers worked together well. Although Ricky had yet to ask Summer to be his wife, his father, Jerald Clovis, gave him the gift knowing that his son ask Summer were meant to be together. Ricky took great pride in calling himself a land owner, especially at the age of sixteen. He strived to live up to the “eldest son” persona that had been placed upon him. His parents, his brother in particular, thought of him as the perfect son and brother. Ricky was a great young man with extreme potential. People strive their whole lives to have what Ricky had already been blessed with. A family, which thought the sun raised and set on him. A passionate and affectionate ”wife” to be. And the land which had been handed down generation after generation. In the south, family is the diamond and land is gold in which it should be set. And Ricky had all these things before he was seventeen.
She’s wanting to leave the Netherlands and move to France where she’s found herself the perfect studio. But she’s needed to raise additional funds after one of her principal backers let her down. Because I love her work and because I wanted to help, I decided, despite the mutterings of my piggy bank, to buy two small prints.
The Bishop of our diocese, Most Rev. Edward Kmiec, has directed his flock to refrain from dispensing the precious blood and to omit the Sign of Peace from the liturgy in an attempt to protect us from passing the nasty virus like a green bean cassarole at a parish pot-luck. He has also advised those who are ill that their obligation is lifted; it seems obvious, but there are those who so dearly love the Lord that they cannot imagine not attending Mass on Sunday, and will drag themselves in on a respirator and dialysis machine if necessary. While admirable, in a pandemic it would be prudent to stay home. So stay home. Really. Bishop said so. It's okay.
I use about 75g-100g (3-4 ounces) macaroni per person cooked as per packet instructions. I would like to warn you at this stage that when I cook pasta I could feed the street with it. I never seem to get it quite right.
The blush, Glowing Blush Harmony, will be available in January. Just a touch of peach.
I really cannot wait to see this movie! I already wanted to before, but now it is a must!
“Yes, Dad.”
1/2 cup dried currants, or raisins
lol.. you gotta ask.. excess what? haha
However, it's interesting that the resignations comes less than 48 hours after it was revealed that the toppest of the Met's top brass, including Stephenson himself, made not one but two intimidating visits to the Guardian to tell them that their coverage of the hacking scandal was exaggerated. They particularly disliked the claims that the police were in any way colluding in the hacking.
“Okay. That’s not what I expected, but I’m still happy that you decided to tell me all that. I’m not happy about what you told me, but I’m glad that you told me.” Patti adjusted her legs because they were cramping, and she needed to stall a little to think. “As for Jarrad, I think he’s a great guy, and I think that of all the people you might be in love with, he’s a great choice.” She cleared her throat before going on, more stalling. “As far as telling him all that other stuff, that’s a tough question. I mean, if you don’t tell him, how is he going to find out?”
Or so I thought.
Shain Kirby interviewed me this week about aggression and bite statistics in response to growing concern over the possible introduction of state-wide BSL in Texas. Here is an excerpt - read the entire interview at the below link.
So, the next thing I did was craft the logs for the fire.
Diane Kruger posed for photographers on the red carpet at the premiere of her new movie Farewell, My Queen, French translation: “Les adieux à la Reine”, during the first day of the 62nd Berlin International Film Festival 2012 on Thursday (February 9) at Berlinale Palast in Berlin, Germany.
NewsMax.com
Inside Jacket:
June is when I finally got diagnosed with depression and I'm so so grateful that I'm on medication and can now see the forest through the trees. What a difference a few changes can make in ones life.So for June I couldn't help but pick this card. The message is clear and Nikki Sivils always makes me smile with her collections, her smile and her kindness.
In whom the Father is well-pleased,
"What's happened, are you hurt, are the kids OK?"
You are in control of this. You control what kind of condition you are in. If you treat you body like an old clunker, don’t be surprised when everyone wants to take you for a spin, and then go get a new car. You are valuable. Keep yourself new. Keep yourself unused. Then you will be the one everyone wants and they will be willing to make the long-term commitment to have you. You will be desirable and Dateable.
such that it would be consistent with and acceptable to the divine will?
Nicholas Appel - Sterrs!
(oh, & he decided not to get another tattoo! THANKS TO BROOKE!!)
“What do these conflicts have to do with me?” Brulee asked.
Following Pug to Kelewan and back, trailing after Jimmy through the Thieves’ Highway, hanging on to Arutha’s belt all over Krondor with the secret police hot on his heels, feeling the heave of the ocean swells as Amos gets them all through the Straits of Darkness….
Maybe a bobblehead, but not a Puffle.
His call for clean energy and improving our infrastructure with a high-speed rail system are nothing new. I’ve heard this all before and, although the ideas are good, I question whether independent “I-love-my-car” Americans will embrace electric cars and high-speed rail. Geographically our country is much larger than nations with successful lightning-speed rail systems. And how, exactly, will this be funded?
Now it begins with a Barnes and Noble and ends with a McDonald's. In between are a Victoria's Secret, Pottery Barn, Duane Reade, Chase Bank (among several other banks), Banana Republic, and any other ubiquitous corporate entity you care to mention. I don't think there are more than three or four independently run businesses along the span, and those are affairs so tiny you wouldn't even notice them.
some – not so much
To me, this is Douglas Adams’ legacy. Things aren’t always easy. They don’t always go to plan. No matter what we think, or how important we think we are, there’s always a bigger picture that doesn’t have us in it. And yet, amongst all the chaos, uncertainty, the salmon of doubt and irrelevance there’s always something, however tiny, that’s funny, beautiful, hopeful and our job, or rather the key to our happiness and fulfillment, is to find and focus on that.
I added some green ribbon and a bow to add a bit of highlight.
Thank you again, Mark, for indulging my special brand of madness. You are a gentleman and way too good for such nerdly musings.
- How the Mentor System came into place as part of the Irish Selection Process
He stayed for three weeks and two days
Okay, so it’s funny.
LISTENING: I just love Adele’s Rolling in the Deep – no wonder she got that extended ovation weeks ago at the Grammys, and I am enjoying other extraordinary voices auditioning for The Voice on television.
Represent to yourself Jesus Christ fastened to a Cross, to expiate the sins of all mankind. Consider in his passion, as in a faithful mirrour and glass, how enormous sin is. At this spectacle, excite your heart to conceive so great a sorrow of them, as never more to commit them.
I love darts you see. In fact, it's my dream to be there at The Alexandra Palace at The Professional World Darts Championship dressed as Wonder Woman, drinking pints and waving my 180 sign in the air surrounded by half a dozen smurfs, Batman, and a ridiculous amount of people in Santa hats!
Email me via the website and again thank you for your support and kind words!
This time though, a head full of steam,
According to the Arctic Climate Impact Assessment group, Artic ice melts faster than at the remainder of the earth because darker water and ground, once exposed, traps heat more rapidly than ice and snow.
Looks like, GuerillaLighting just started. Nevertheless I’m pretty sure their will be more to see soon!
she wove it into existence, she chanted under her breath a spell of healing
So how do I feel about reviews? I’m completely neutral. Other than PW, Kirkus, Fresh Fiction and any newspaper reviews, I pay no attention. On the whole, I get more positive reviews than negative ones, but I always get at least one stupid one per book. The delivery person is my current WTF reviewer. On my last book the person happened to say Fat Chance was terrible and had no chance of surviving as a series. Guess she missed the two books before that and the two books after Fat Chance. Oh, and she made a point of telling people I was no match for Janet Evanovich and she had no idea why Janet had given me a quote. Another WTF moment. Hard to get worked up over ill-informed people who get to hide behind the anonymity provided by the Internet.
This beautiful Elisabeth Bell stamp, Cinnamon Sugar, stole my heart at first glance and is perfect for the occasion. I colored her with rosy pinks and aquas, and incorporated some extra sparkle along the way. It's upsetting that they do not show in this image, but I used four Copic-colored aqua rhinestones on the top of her apron, deep red rhinestones for the cherries atop the cupcakes, and added shimmer to the hearts on her dress because love always sparkles. You all need to go buy a cupcake so you can see how sparkly it really looks. :o) I used Broken China Distress Ink and a cloud template to give her a sky backdrop, which photographed a bit washed out. I also made her a grassy hill to dance upon during her cupcake picnic. Cupcakes always make me happy-dance.
Years later, I got to read some of those stories in Urdu fiction writer Mumtaz Mufti’s second part of autobiography ‘Alakh Nagri’, where he had quoted the same news report. Mumtaz Mufti remained aloof to religion for most part of his life. Due to rigid depiction of religion he felt rather attracted to Sufis and that became a regular narrative in later part of his life.
Sate Belut ( Eel Satay )
The brewery led off with a red ale nearly a year ago, a beer made as much to work out the brewing processes on its equipment as much as anything. But the matter of who would tend the kettle proved to be an early problem, and with all of the competing interests and time constraints of the owners, finding a brewer proved to be something that was not easily resolved.
Why am I scared? This is when you cast your eyes at the picture (courtesy of Kush and Wizdom on Tumbler) and see what I mean.
And I am wondering only how I got there in the wormhole out of a paradox
Mojave Narrow Half Marathon - 6/30/12
You can see the size, and lines of this small dining room table are perfect for the office.... the red's just maybe a little.... jarring. ;)
E-BOOK SALE: Neil Gaiman's American Gods for Kindle and Nook for 1.99. For a limited time only, I would imagine. (it's even the 10 year anniversary edition which has the "author's preferred text.") I haven't read it since it came out - it'll be fun to read it again. Hooray for sales! I may continue to post about e-book sales that I find interesting, like say the Dangerous Angels collection with Bonus Materials FOR FREE. (The Weetzie Bat books! I read them for the first time this last year and loved them, loved them.) (again, I don't know how long this sale lasts.) Remember, you don't have to have a kindle to read kindle books - you can read them on a kindle app for your phone or on the computer and I'm sure there are other ways, too.
I feel normal again, and an added bonus, I no longer have the 2-3:00 musttakeanap slump.
I met my sister, we filmed the whole two days in Paris and someone from the TV show came to collect the video camera a couple of days later. After that, we haven’t heard a thing from them until almost three months later….
And though the mountains be carried into the midst of the sea;
I am hoping that things will settle down some in June!
My little boy has a teacher that comes over every Friday and works with him on his speech, since he was a very late talker. But now he basically leads the session! She says not many of the kids she sees get to his level by the time she is done with them, so I am really thankful for that! I wanted to give her a little something for Christmas and a "thanks for teaching my kid to talk" gift. ;)
So building fires
We wanted to make the launch advertising simple and challenging. For Hollows to go out into the world proclaiming its place as the genuine ginger, challenging the fakes. We used letter-pressed woodblock type, set in simple blocks, and bold headlines.
One of Lee’s primary love languages is words of affirmation. I know that I don’t do the best job with this, so I wanted to include encouraging words in my countdown. On January 11, I gave Lee a gift and an index card telling him one reason that I love him. This continued for the next 29 days. Every day, he awoke to find a gift and an index card with a new reason that I love him. The gifts weren’t anything big, extravagant, or expensive. A couple of them were even free. Most of the gifts were things Lee uses or would have bought anyway. The cards were also a gift in and of themselves. Once Lee received all 30 cards, I clipped them together with a ring and made a book out of them. Now he can always look back and read 30 reasons that I love him.
To make the existing consumers to uptrade to 1Kg size, and capture the heavy users of the competitive brands like Complan and Viva.
* Some recipes I saw called for regular white sugar; some for brown sugar. I decided to use a bit of both! I like the flavor of brown sugar, but I didn’t want it to overwhelm or be too rich. So in the 3/4 cup of sugar, I used about a half and half mixture.
Admittedly, it’s not nearly as ambitious as what Paul Miller is doing, but with any luck, this will help me complete the final year of my university course on time.
It appears that the create page does not honor the Startup option “Manual” vs “Auto”. Perhaps this is because I do not understand the reasoning behind these options?? At any rate, the default setting of manual still results in a running virtual machine upon creation (most likely for setting the ip address).
I fucked her with abandon. My hand alternated between grabbing her hip, slapping her ass, and rubbing her clit.
The father of our 15 month old, Baby H, has forfeited his parental rights due to not showing up in court. This is a victory for Baby H and her mother. This man has never once expressed interest in his daughter and I don't think he has even met her. The rights of her mother are uncertain as her health is deteriorating. We are hoping for some news regarding permanent custody of Baby H in the next 90 days. Please keep all of us in your prayers.
An Abyssinian maid, did curvaceously simmer
I feel bad for my friends who had spring break last week when the weather was kinda sorta crappy. Sucks to be them. Ok, I’m not that mean. Sorry.
Rick Perry isn't having any of it, and has sued to stop implementation of the EPA's guidelines, but a federal court has refused to block the EPA until such time as the matter is resolved.
“I just want you to see me,” I replied.
Oh heck there's so much water passed ... since we had them salad days"
1 cup orange juice
The mystery to me is the malt and yeast character, which is very little, but the body and ABV are right in line for an IPA. There is a slight sweet/bready quality on the back end that does a nice job of taking the edge off the hop bitterness. But no carmel or roasty or grain or smokey. Nothing to get in the way of enjoying that fantastic Simcoe hops flavor.
Mother: Pre…c…lla….uhhh(crying)….oohhh(crying)
The discrepancy between what modern humans presume to know and what they can imagine—given the background of pride and self-congratulation—is amusing and even funny. It becomes more serious as it raises issues of responsibility. It becomes fearfully serious when we start dealing with statistical measures of industrial destruction.
Besides, I’ve already planned to do a 1 month cleanse after graduation (first a 3 day juice cleanse and then spend the rest of the month on a no sugar, no gluten, no alcohol diet). Hopefully whatever crap I pile into my system will get sorted out after I say goodbye to Boston, Brandeis, and my buds and move back to St. Louis to start the rest of my life.
(as many people said) in his own pool, full of insecurities, paranoid and always in need for someone
Julien caught him by the shoulders, gripped him hard. “Well I do,” he said fiercely. “You’re coming home.”
The things is, it scares me that I don’t mind failing. what if i really fuck up one time and there is no way to fix it? To be honest, I care more about what my parents will think if i fail more than what will happen to me when i fail.
The day wasn't wasted though, as we love a good day trip & had a wonderful breakfast in a small diner called Gold Street Cafe. It had very friendly (& heavily tattooed) staff & quirky decor. None of the tables or chairs matched & instead of being average restaurant furniture, they all looked like they were purchased at thrift & antique shops. Very quaint & a killer cup of decaf. I had a mushroom & spinach omelet & a bowl of fruit. Chucky had their pork chops with scrambled eggs, fruit & cottage cheese. Everything was very tasty, they accidentally put cheese on my omelet, but in two minutes flat my replacement arrived.
“All of the discoveries about intention and remote influence have similarly proceeded from asking a seemingly absurd question: what if our thoughts could affect the things around us?”
Now, get the cut off legs & cut them open. I laid it on the front and drew a chalk line where I wanted to cut and trimmed it so I could turn my seams down. You could totally pin & sew -AND THEN cut. You would probably need to use pinking shears so it wouldn't fray as bad.
Morgan (my freshman) has been running JV track all season and kicking some bootay and usually medaling each meet (1st, 2nd, or 3rd).. in the 3200m and the mile... well last week they moved him up to the VARSITY to run... he was telling me "Mom I am SO gonna get killed up there!"... I just said as long as you are doing your best and beating your time you can't really do too much better! Well he placed 7th last week in the 2mile and 8th in the mile but had a personal best time... so this week was his 'take a break week'... and he ran the 800 on VARSITY and placed FIFTH!!! This my friends means he letters as a freshman in track!! I'm so stinkin' excited for him!! He will also letter in baseball this year as well... and had he went to playoffs with the basketball team like he was asked he would have got a regional patch as well.. but oh well! (he decided to go play baseball instead of sit the bench in playoffs... a decision he regrets... lol)
Amber Rose by Wayne Maser for Lifestyle Mirror Magazine. Amber is styled in pieces by Costume National, Valentino,Hermes, Roland Mouret, and Michael Kors. See more at
And we make mistakes.
This is the first challenge for the most of our newest Dt members and i want to again welcome them all to our team... WELCOME TO Creative craft challenges we hope you enjoy your time with us here,
Just wanted to pass along a fun idea!
“Whatever,” she said dismissively.
“Rio” drew $26.8 million (57 percent of which from 3D presentations) to keep it number one for a second week.
Is silence the same thing as
I wasn't involved in this particular resuscitation but I went looking for a resident to get a work note for a patient of mine. I found him working on saving a kid who was obviously far gone. It was a gruesome scene. They performed a thoracotomy, or cracked his chest if you will, and the staff surgeon was massaging his heart. A resident also had a hand in there and he said he felt a bullet. I returned to my patient and told him that his doctor was tied up but I didn't expect it to be for long.
From my subconscious
I will do my best to set up a "Tour Package". Those of you who offer to let me drop by on my hop, I'm hoping to hook you up with a "copy" of the book. It will be an e-book, of course. Print may come later, I'm still not sure about that. I'd also like to have a little banner or something. I'm sort of waiting to see what my cover will look like first. Woot!
One of the greatest gifts, we all have received, along with the birth of Christ is our own unique differences.Not all celebration need be literal to another time or place either, as who can find complaint, about the spirit of giving through love? Isn’t that really the lesson our children are learning? It is a fine tradition to give thanks, make sacrifices for others, and to give of ourselves to those less fortunate than ourselves. It has been my experience, that people who go to little or no trouble beyond a few Christmas cards or who ban Christmas altogether, or perhaps hand over cash out of a sense of obligation,duty or image and often resent the same ,instead of going to the effort and joy of personal shopping and giving, are often the first to slam Santa. Some will never understand the spirit of, “Santa,” as many of them will openly hang onto the idea that Christmas has become too commercialised. There does appear to be a real bitterness found in these people who would criticize the Santa Claus believers. Often, not always, I have found they do lack empathy for others, beyond their own black and white self-righteous world.
I’m different now you can see
Because vermouth and quinquinas are relatively similar in many ways, they can be substituted for each other in many recipes. However, the increased bitterness of a quina may require slight changes in the proportions in order to achieve the proper balance. Bonal in particular has a wonderful earthy, slightly bitter flavor. Because of this, I tend to pair it with rum, though not exclusively. I find that its earth depth plays especially well with rum's light, slightly sweet taste.
My wife bought me a coke out of her machine at work.
The splintering of Rock Music into numerous sub-categories was in full force by the end of '69. While folk-rock and acid rock had "flowered" between 1965 and 1967, it was 1969 that gave us the first big hit of jazz-rock via Miles Davis, Blood, Sweat & Tears and the Chicago Transit Authority. Blues-rock was almost over, as evidenced by the deaths of Cream, Blind Faith and John Mayall breaking up his Bluesbreakers (for a jazzier sound). The Band came out from behind Dylan's shadow and brought a resurgence of "back to the earth" style traditional/acoustic music that saw everyone from Crosby Steals the Cash to Bonnie & Delaney promoting the rootsier sound of American music. It seems like the musicians at that time were tired of just playing good old pop or rock music. Experimenting with longer song structures and not even wanting a top forty hit were the new requirements for being a successful band. Disaster was coming for those who enjoyed a good tight, three-minute song with memorable hooks and a great melody. The purity of Rock music as the counterculture’s artistic expression, musicians as the "modern day painters" of the late twentieth century was changing. Moneychangers in the temple like David Geffen had corrupted everything down to simply dollars and cents. If all that weren’t enough, the cold wind of Prog arsery would soon be upon us all.
Hooray! After many weeks of laziness I am back! I got all my scheduled runs in this week.....which is only 3 and I actually rode my bike one day.
Beth talked of her brother, and said, “Don’t you have someone we want so much to be in the presence of the King one day? But, they want nothing to do with Jesus at this point.”
But usually if we hang in there,
I don't really feel the need to focus on the graphic ways that Martin goes about making his own human centipede or the two instances of serious sexual dysfunction that he displays, because I'd merely be repeating what everyone else has already said. There are a couple of things about this movie that I found interesting that almost no one has mentioned. First of all, bodies that have been mutilated beyond recognition really, really gross me out, so the scene where Martin bashes his mother's head in with a crowbar and then sits her body up at the kitchen table was truly traumatizing for me. The sight of her mushy skull seriously made me want to throw up more than the pooping scene. Go figure. Excellent work on the makeup effects there, because I had to look away from the screen.
Heidi has generously offered, this weeks winner:
He should give up the fight.
The answer is both 'yes' and 'no', of course. Any author who cares enough and has even minimal technical ability can convert their out-of-print books into various e-book formats. As long as they own the copyright, of course. That last point means those interminable character-led series (Animal Ark, etc) will disappear as soon as the publisher can't be bothered with them. And no bad thing, you might think.
Now understand, I don't play court jester, or try to deceive, I simply make it a point to be attentive, and am usually able the cater to the hunger one longs for. That evening, I acted as if only she existed ...but then again, only she existed. While I had no intentions on pursuing any thing with her after that evening, I catered to her without catering to any silly whims. That night we danced, talked, indulged in an occasional flow of liqueur, and peppered the night with a moderate amount of innocent smiles thus simmering the dish called possibilities. As the night started to come to a close, she expressed that she was feeling a little under the weather, and that the rain certainly didn't help. I asked her if we could exchange numbers, and I'd be sure to check up on her in the next few days. Numbers were exchanged and the night eventually came to an end as I walked her and the other 2 to a waiting taxi.
This new year, consider saying "Yes" to yourself and your joys by incorporating this visualization - that all your heart's desires are fulfilled - for a few minutes every day into your life. If you like, keep a journal beside you as you do it so you may jot down what may arise. Go to the source of what you truly desire and get out of your own way so that you may realize it. This practice sets in motion, at a vibrational level, all the support required for your life to be just as you wish it to be.
But these disruptive innovations are more threatening than industry leaders realize.
Some good news is that I have an interview for a job on Friday. I had prayed about going back to work as littlest starts school in September. I had prayed that a job would "come to me" and that I wouldn't feel stressed about trying to find something. Well, something did come to me. The Deputy head of an independent Christian School not too far from me had also been praying about a position needing filled and my name had dropped into his mind. I am certain that I am right for that job. It means also that my children will be able to attend it as well which is a bonus as fees are expensive. (Not as expensive as other private schools but still expensive to me!) So I have had to think about getting my teaching head in gear as I haven't used it properly in a good few years. Saying that, I have been doing a little bit of tutoring this year so I am half way there already I guess. For those of you who don't know, I am trained as a secondary English teacher. Crafting has definitely taken a back seat this last month.
“I have to sort myself first, Marge. It'll be the same deal with the next man. If they give me a spike they'll want a hit for it or start crying! I'll leave you a small hit, enough to put you right, then I'll pass back around later after I've got sorted and scored again.”
First of all, don't underestimate the importance Dick placed upon clutching hotties several decades his junior to his sagging breast. That kind of thing was very important to him! Second, don't make a dead science fiction writer do your dirty work for you. Imagining Philip K Dick returning from the grave to deliver your criticism to a crappy actor for a string of bad films ... well I suppose it's like my wishing that Shakespeare were here right now so he could help me explain to you exactly how self-important you sound.
08 Chuck
Hollie
People who put self-indulgence ahead of principle get what we get, which is to say, flaccidity, cowardice, and dishonor.
UPDATE (3): 22nd March, 2012. This is the analysis of the 83-page judgment.
My head gets it. The Heart is the one that needs some convincing.
Many foreigners know that Thai girls are beautiful and hot. They can be good wives. Thai women like honest and sincere men with a strong sense of responsibilities. Charming Thai women are the dream girl of many men. How can you make Thai girl fall in love with you and how can you win her heart? What things you should know? Apart from the general dating tips, there are important and peculiar panorama of Thai folk customs of which you mus have a good understanding.
Christian Christiansen (Bass), Susanne Resmark (Alto), Peter Fog (Baritone),
Okay, I’ve joined or decided to join a few things recently, so I thought I’d just take a moment to share them with all of you.
Lastly, I just didn't like the author's tone. In nearly all chapters she lays out the main point (one of the 7 steps) and then follows it with an example of what the "intentional mother" would do. In nearly all cases she is the "intentional mother". The personal examples of how to parent intentional all involve herself and her own children. Each example being a perfect example of what "the intentional parent" should do if they want to do it "right". Perhaps spreading the examples out among other "intentional mothers" would have made it seem less like a "I have this all figured out and I did it right so follow me" book. And if being the "perfect" example of the intentional mother wasn't bad enough, she belittled other mothers and their parenting throughout the book as well. She speaks of "well meaning, Christian moms" who set their children up for failure because of the way they leave them in the church nursery. She speaks of the wife of a minister who failed her daughter when she got pregnant because of what she said to her. She gives plenty of examples of mothers who are not doing it "right" and lays them out as examples of what not to do. I wanted to say, "hey, we're all doing the best we can. We all mess this up. If we could do it perfectly we wouldn't need God!"
P.P.S. January 23, 2012
42
I've been wrong before
*These sites can be clunky and difficult to navigate so take care and time when booking your tickets.
The senator is implying that women do not have the right to choose their sexual partners, demand safe sex and whenever they are propositioned for sex women are going to say yes without any hesitation. Is the Senator really saying that men have no self control to the extent that whenever they see an attractive woman they cannot resist her and will sleep with her and without protection? So if we have bald, badly dressed and thin women the infection rate of HIV will come plummeting down? During the period when women are busy shaving their head, going on crash diets and changing their wardrobes what exactly are the men going to be doing? The Senator did not tell us what he and the rest of the men folk should do to play their part to decrease HIV infection or does the responsibility fall only on women?
I will keep you, Suzy, busy,
And of course, the little guy himself. Here are some pictures from today so that you can enjoy him as well. :)
The paprika adds to the color. It wasn't till I was reviewing the ingredients while dining that I remembered the paprika. It's easy to think the bright color is ALL on account of the bell peppers. The truth is, the paprika helps it out.
The panel - which contains some of Britain's leading scientists and academics - said officers should no longer routinely take samples at the point of arresting a suspect.
Other than the immortals being turned into sex puppets by the very presence of angels, the series manages to handle sex in a much more adult fashion. There’s an informant that Rin and Mimi use that demands sex as payment for her information, but Rin and Mimi keep choosing to use her so instead of it being simply exploitative, it complicates their characters. Rin and Mimi are certainly the heroes of the piece but they’re more than willing to give their bodies over to these informants in their quest for information they can’t achieve any other way. As the series progresses, Mimi even seems to enter into a relationship with one of the informants, seeming to choose this method of research much quicker than she did when it was Rin engaging in the sexual exchange.
My dream is to become a chef and own a bakery shop or a restaurant with my brother. I would be really happy to see customers buy and eat what I bake.
I found this Spinner at the Learning Shop exhibit booth at I Teach K. They also run a mail order teacher supply company. The owners, Dave and Doris, are a very nice retired couple that run their business by following many of the SDE conferences and exhibiting at them if it is not too far from their home in Indiana. Dave and I have gotten to know each other over the past year, and when he saw me, he asked if I had seen the new spinners that he had in stock. I replied that I had not, so I went over to take a look.
The nine unions, while fighting for the rights of the textile mill workers, also call upon the citizens of Mumbai to wake up and join the fight to save scarce space in the city.
Despite the vile act, the teacher does not appear to be repentant in court as he said to the judge in mitigation:
Unless of course it's her mother who's saying that.
In addition, if you have all 8 like me, you’ll get a cool effect!
Scholarship Includes 30 Student and School Awards in 2009
But more than that, they teach us that we ourselves also live inside a fairy tale. The same fundamental qualities in fairy tales also exist in our own lives. Our life has the same unexpectedness of the hero’s adventures in fairyland. “The supreme adventure is being born. There we walk suddenly into a splendid and startling trap. There we see something of which we have not dreamed before. Our father and mother lie in wait for us and leap out on us, like brigands from a bush” (Chesterton, Heretics). Just like in a fairy tale, God creates the characters for his story and throws them into a world of wonder and danger. God leaves it to us either to shrink from this adventure or to embrace it.
1 Loweville 2:12
Our 3rd and last stop before sailing back to CA was in Cabo San Lucas. I'm not an expert on this next part, but this was my interpretation. In PV & Mazatlan, we were docked on a pier. Meaning we could walk on and off the ship and be on land. In Cabo, we anchored and had to take tender (smaller boats) from our ship into the pier to be on land. Our shortest port time was in Cabo, which also made the tendering process seem worse than it actually was. We had planned a snorkeling trip, so by the time we waited to get on a tender boat, got to the pier we had to immediately jump on our catamaran to go snorkeling. As soon as we got back from snorkeling we had to get in line to get on a tender boat to get back to the ship. Overall, its a long process especially when you have 3,000 on a ship and 10 or so tender boats that hold 50 people.
~Susan
"That's still under what's considered a minimum healthy weight, but at least then it would only be five pounds under."
“This is a new social disease affecting Banda Aceh. If it is allowed to continue, the government will have to spend more money to handle them,” the deputy mayor said, adding that religious scholars were assisting at the camp.
She is ONE SPECIAL LADY! She's just as cute as a button and as sweet as can be! I want to go back to London.
Whenever I am attempting to meet top-level buyers in my accounts, my initial approach is a simple one. I am usually asking for ten minutes of their time so that I can introduce myself and my company to them, describe how I work with my customers, and show them how we are different.
Keep heading east on Arlington Dr. which will take you down a nice little hill and at the bottom of this hill it will turn into Mitchell Ave. Mitchell Ave. takes you back across McCausland (aka Skinker if you’re further north) and leads you into what is considered to be Dogtown.
Turns out, nope.
‘It’s really done nothing for us’
In the city of Kyoto
We begin with Scripture written long before Jesus was born. Genesis, the first book of the Bible, explains how man chose to disobey God. Because Adam and Eve ate the forbidden fruit, their descendants are all born under the curse of death, having inherited a sinful “flesh” nature. In Leviticus, God’s laws for the Jewish nation included observance of Yom Kippur, the day each year when the Israelites fasted, prayed, and sacrificed an animal to atone for sin. In essence, the goat would bear the wrongs done by the people and suffer the penalty that divine justice required.
DOC SAVAGE: THE DESERT DEMONS by Kenneth Robeson (great new novel)
But the situation is really quite similar to the arrival of big box behemoths like Home Depot or Kmart. While many bemoan their presence, complaining of service and quality of product, many secretly appreciate the pricing, selection and hours.
George Galloway's victory in Bradford West was partly due to Labour's failure to connect with the Asian community, the shadow home secretary has said.
Sam Bracanov / Two Statements / 137
My name is Jennifer and I am a full time working mother with three children. Outside of work and taking care of a house full of crumb snatchers, I am taking online classes at night to try and finish my Master's Degree in HR Management. My husband is a volunteer first responder/fire fighter in the township where we live, on top of working full time as well.
When I finally did click "End Chat" and answer the questions he kept referencing, I answered the "How can we improve the chat experience?" question with the obvious answer: "No robots."
As a company, we can not claim that we are a gluten free facility as we do not specifically test for gluten and we have a test kitchen on site that does contain flour. The blending and packaging room is completely separate from the kitchen, but legally we can not advertise our blends as being "gluten free".
maybe outside there is my old home.
Hope you are having a great week and looking forward to the weekend.
I am a super sedentary person. Sure, I work out 6 days a week, but if I’m not working out I’m typically sitting on my butt. Right now I am freelancing from home. Here is my typical routine: sleep (laying), get up, make coffee, have coffee and read email (sitting), workout, come back home, work (sitting), make lunch, go back to work (sitting), make dinner, watch tv with husband (sitting) or read (sitting), go to bed (laying). That’s a LOT of sitting in one day.
and comes to you
As for my single disappointed, well, now that Milk Bar has opened just across the street, I didn't save any room to go there for something sweet post lunch! But I'll be back soon enough. From here, I hopped on the L Train again, and then walked over to the High Line for a nice walk to burn off some lunch! And what an amazing lunch it was!
For those of you who don’t know about the brand, Monica Vinader is situated in the picturesqueNorth Norfolkcoast. The timeless pieces are based around travel and amalgamating cultures from the East and West. Mainly basing the collections around cut semi-precious stones and pearls is the main feature that appealed to me.
Remove the ginger with a slotted spoon and slowly beat the warm milk into the eggs and sugar. Pour the entire mixture back into the saucepan and place over low heat. Stir constatnly with a whisk or wooden spoon until custard thickens slightly. Do not let mixture boil unless you want scrambled eggs. And we don't!
Gad! I’d hate to be a judge and suffer full disclosure in this case.
It is about two boys and their families from different worlds, one Australian, one Moroccan. It shows two different cultures, two different countries, two different families and the day-to-day life of each family.
And then the World’s Worst Special Effect comes in and kills Jonah King. I mean, seriously. It’s like he got eaten by a Ray Harryhausen short. But the upshot is, the good guys (the dead guy who escaped from Hell and the violent unemployed woman) won and the bad guys (the religious group and their charismatic leader) died and the baby is safe! Sure, if the baby hadn’t been so sluggish at jumping from a moving vehicle, all this could have happened with minimum loss of life, but these are the lessons childhood teaches us.
we get together once a month - it's a must!
At 6:00 I texted my midwife to let her know what was going on.
My eyes narrowed when the met and I approached the back of my borrowed stead and wrote the funk’d punks info in the dirt. ( Good thing it just rained, plenty of smog to scribe this felon in trainings details)
I was on my way to Target.
“Madam,” I would have said, “your current state of undress is plainly the consequence of an agitated mind. What say I bring you a cup of coffee from yonder café, that we may discuss your aspirations in a civilised manner? Nudity is far more likely to yield a satisfactory outcome when combined with friendly negotiation. You will forgive me for taking the car keys with me.”
New Belgium - Frambozen,2 Below
“Certainly, of course,” replied Rothmon. “Now let me see… this was an unofficial mission as I recall,” he said talking mostly to himself as he pulled some papers from a drawer and began pouring over them while flipping beads on his abacus. “Yes, hmmm… at first I supposed it might be a 1st or 2nd level mission, but in the end I was compelled to believe it was 3rd level after all, given the dangers. And you did complete the rescue and all the children of the Hagglesmith Horde were rescued. And you uncovered a long standing mystery and brought new revelations regarding Doctor Lobe to light. And as well, you made some interesting discoveries regarding the underground layout of Dunn’s Bridge and its link to the Five Crows Tavern. And not least of all you managed to help break up a kidnapping ring, and bring those villains to justice, two of whom sit in jail at this time, and one of whom died what I believe was a very unnatural death indeed. He was withered with old age on his left side, if I get the story straight… is that correct?”
I've been a bit productive over the last few weeks - cleaning out the kids' dressers and getting them ready for fall. I reorganized our pantry and filled it with HEALTHY things. I'm still on my quest for better health, and I'm excited to share that I'm down 17 lbs! WOOHOO!! It helps that we're eating yummy food - like this:
Hello, everyone! Today I have something really exciting to share! Are you ready?
As LibreOffice is approaching its final 3.5.0 release, I’d like to sum up the RTL status for RC1.
Oh Wikipedia you are a wonderful site.
Encourage your child to be with friends when traveling back and forth from school, during shopping trips, or on other outings. Bullies are less likely to pick on a child in a group.
and forth in his stocking feet, reading a book with a black cover. Years later, I came to
One more close-up picture of it. Isn't it a tempting one? :-)
And Sister Dangerfield is my new companion! She is from Cedar City, Utah and this is her first area in Brazil (she also got to serve a part of her mission in Alabama while she was waiting for her visa...cool, huh?) It´s awesome...we´re already super good friends because we´ve been in the same district for the last 3 transfers and I am so happy and excited that now we get to be companions! Sister Dangerfield is awesome...she is fun and loving and always always serving! The members, the investigators, people on the street, me....it´s an amazing example to me! I love her a lot and I know we´re going to have an awwwwwesome transfer together! Oh, another cool thing about Sister Dangerfield... she was roommates at BYU with Laura Sederberg and Julia Blackham and hung out of few times with Aubrey Clegg, Steve Holmes and Archie!! Hahaha...it´s been fun to remember and talk about old times with her... :D
3000/FHQ/ABJ/SEB/08/03/11
I agree that culture holds a very special place in the world of design. We try to capture the vibrancy and energy of the Indian culture in our designs and we do this mainly through color. We choose colors that are rich in tone and very reflective of Indian textiles and traditional sarees. Also, most of our products are made using gorgeous Indian raw silk, which is a material that is not commonly used on our sphere of the earth.
For example, today was arguably one of the most trying days of my career. I’ve had many rough days causing me to reflect and give pause regarding my ambitions and the purpose of life. You know, deep stuff. (Daily dose of death can truly cause one to appreciate life.) I generally catalogue those days and store them in the recesses of my mind hoping never to revisit their awful horror. Imagine for a moment unleashing all of those suppressed emotions at once. It happened to me today in an instant.
The kids are rushing out to play in the garden and I make a long arm and grab both for their weekly pop quiz – What are your private parts? Who can touch them? Are you allowed to touch anyone there? Do you need to tell mama if someone scares you and says not to tell her? Will you get into a car with a stranger? Will you take food from someone you don’t know? Which side of the road are you supposed to walk on? Which is the smallest continent? Which is the biggest planet?
Sherri Wilson Johnson is the author of To Dance Once More and Song of the Meadowlark. She is from Georgia, has been married since 1988, and is a former homeschooling mom. She loves to write, read, eat ice cream, ride roller coasters and make people laugh. She loves Jesus and hopes to spread His love to the whole world through her writing.
But we already have 4 commitments for 2013.
How are you sexing up that wilderness crawl? Can you impart a feeling of something unique about that land without achieving eye glazing? How do you make the wilderness itself the adventure? What's your trick?
Delia Smith is mounting a campaign to defend Christianity against attacks by 'militant neo-atheists' – who she claims are engaged in a 'running battle’ with believers. The veteran television chef was prompted to make her outspoken remarks by a series of high-profile rows over the role of religion in modern life.
My DD loves that it’s called operation prom… so I’m sticking with it. Day 2 however was very eventful and I was not able to sew as much as I had planned. Almost the entire morning was spent at the doctor’s office with my son. In the afternoon, I finished up a paper for a class and took really good care of him. I felt a little guilty, because on Monday, I was not convinced he was even sick. But after the doctor had me look at his throat… eeewwww. My poor son is most definitely sick. His throat looked like some horrific photo you’d find on the internet, while google searching for info about a possible illness. Wish I could erase that image from my mind. Poor guy (I’d call him “little guy” affectionately, but at 15, that’s not something he wants me saying anymore) will being pampered again today.
Elections have often been about the economy, the economy and the economy. But in Sarawak, it seems to be about Taib, Taib and Taib.
It’s also vital not to fall out with your author, however testing the circumstances. If you do, you won’t have a book. I have been in a car with an author, having picked up their dog from the vet where it had been put under an anaesthetic. As we sped towards the motorway, the poor creature was on my lap when it suddenly had diarrhoea all over me. Despite my revulsion and fury (expensive mac never the same again), I managed to keep my temper as we stopped the car to wipe both dog and me down. Somehow our good relationship remained intact, though that was a moment when things might very easily have gone the other way.
Charles Frazier's COLD MOUNTAIN is a success, not because of the screenplay that
Lim said lawyers were free to set up their own associations such as the Malaysian Muslim Lawyers Association and the Catholic Lawyers Society but “only the Bar Council is empowered under the Act to set the standards, regulate and issue practising certificates.”
- 1/2 teaspoon of ground nutmeg
Yellow Shoes - eBay
Let’s look at the first account of the Apostle Paul’s salvation experience.
This process of creating the needed body of experts has been carried out on a deliberate basis and a massive scale. Back in I972, Judge Lewis Powell (later elevated to the Supreme Court) wrote a memo to the U.S. Chamber of Commerce urging business “to buy the top academic reputations in the country to add credibility to corporate studies and give business a stronger voice on the campuses.” One buys them, and assures that-in the words of Dr. Edwin Feulner, of the Heritage Foundation-the public-policy area “is awash with in-depth academic studies” that have the proper conclusions. Using the analogy of Procter & Gamble selling toothpaste, Feulner explained that “They sell it and resell it every day by keeping the product fresh in the consumer’s mind.” By the sales effort, including the dissemination of the correct ideas to “thousands of newspapers,” it is possible to keep debate “within its proper perspective.”
matter expert on WCS platform. At the same time, specialists will also be responsible for
It was an unforgettable afternoon, full of laughter and great photos. Then as we were about to leave, the unthinkable happened . . . As I was photographing the group of muchachos, they started to chant my name; "LEELA, OLE OLE OLE OLE, LEELA!!" And I joined them for a photo. The miraculously strong, thinnest one of the bunch, who they all called "La Rana" (the frog), swept me off my feet and held me in the air for quite some time. As they chanted the leela song and I was smiling the goofiest of grins, I thought -- This is my rock star moment!!! and HOLY #$%&, I hope my skirt doesn't blow completely above my head.
jeans-Cheap Monday
Psychedelic Horseshit, Acid Tape
The selling has abated in the municipal fund arena. Though most weeks have seen outflows, they are much smaller, and there were actually inflows a couple of weeks. Part of this is just the normal abatement of pressures, but it is also the recognition, even among retail investors, that things had really reached a point where the market was severely oversold.
This semester I attended the local community college to take an art elective....digital photography. This class is amazing on so many levels. Thinking I was going to learn all the functions of my camera (which I have), but the primary focus is on the art of the photo. We only shoot in RAW and full frame photography...no cropping in this class. The entire picture is graded. The attention is on the composition of the photo; the light, the geometry, and the feel of the photo. Each week we are given a shooting assignment....that is always left for our interpretation. My scientific brain has been pushed to function less in the black and white of things, but learn to live in the grey. I have made many mistakes and find myself humbled by how much I have to learn. On a weekly basis our photo's are shown on the gallery wall and critiqued by our peers and professors. I have had my photo's picked a part and elements liked. I am thankful for this hour of truth...it is what pushes me to grow....to take risks....to want to learn more. I have gained a great appreciation for this beautiful form of art.
Publisher: ST. Martin's Griffin
Here's a picture from last year when it started warming up. This is what Mark and Avery were doing yesterday, playing at the park, but they were riding their scooters. It feels like spring and it's a wonderful relief.
Inviting
That the most embarrassing, awkward moments of your life are only remembered by you and no one else. That no one judges you when you walk into a room and all they really want to know, is if you’re judging them. That what you make and what you do with your time is more important than you’ll ever fathom and should be treated as such. That the difference between a job and art is passion. That neither defines who you are. That talking to strangers is how you make friends.
submitting endless revisions,
And nobody talks anymore about losing and winning
Connee sang from a wheelchair – or seated position – during her entire career, due to either a childhood bout with polio or a childhood accident (sources differ). The general public was not aware of her condition although Boswell herself did not keep this secret. During World War II, she tried to get involved with the U.S.O. tours but was not given permission to travel overseas. The Army thought it might not be a morale-booster to have a singer who used a wheelchair perform for the troops.
* The connection between Marc-Olivier Strauss-Kahn and Christine Lagarde
Hail to He Who Is the Guide of Souls Above and Below–Rejoice! You are praised!
golly, it's been ages since I posted up any news! I'm currently sitting by the pool, actually in the pool, typing this on my phone. I am in need of some vit d. I've been spending way to much time in side behind a computer screen or in front of a class (yes you heard it, I'm teaching every now and again)!
Gotta be cool, gotta sleep round
She can lay an egg that’s white!
“Readers need reasons to hope. To write the breakout novel, it is necessary to provide readers those reasons not just at the end but all the way through.” (Maass, Donald. Writing the Breakout Novel. Pg. 117)
Thanks for being a part of this new project.
Wait, have I shared this before? I don’t remember, and it probably doesn’t matter! Now, I forgot about this one, and I don’t want to edit out too much things so I’ll just have to post one more anime update. It’s okay right? I mean like, you have read this far so why not just read a few more sentences?
"Taslin laughed." Dora's expression was so alien on her face that Rel, catching a glimpse out of the corner of his narrowed eye, had to look again to be sure. She was actually simpering. This from the woman who shouted at Pevan and Rel all their childhood at the faintest hint of a smirk.
“You are unbelievable.” I tell him
There has not been much research on this topic before now, so this analysis should help anyone interested in learning about tomb art motifs. Also, it is hard to find any information on Oaxacan tomb art so hopefully this can be used as one source to help shed light on their particular culture.
ABC | "U.S. military veterans are sorting through a massive government archaeological collection that has been neglected for decades, with the hope of archiving the stone tools, arrows and American Indian beads that were found beneath major public works projects."
Rnd 8-15) repeat rnd 7
Very drastically and basically from one day to another. Being stuck in a reality I did not enjoy and in a relationship that was draining me, I felt deeply unhappy and felt a force rising within me on regular bases, urging me to act. Knowing that waiting around for things to get better was futile, I opted to finish that which was already broken and started anew, jumping into the unknown and foreign, even though I was terrified. I embarked on a journey that took me through the most unbelievable twists and turns of fate, making me feel a broad spectra of emotions - anything from deep devastation and sadness to happiness of indescribable proportions.
You choose your path, but let me tell you, if you charge less for cretivity because "it's your angle"... you are screwing yourself and all the rest of us at our corner.
It was a little trickier than I thought. The cross-piece for the landing gear was missing, so I used brass rod and had to guess at the length. The upper wing was a pain in the ass to attach, as all its held on with are the struts connecting to the lower wing. But it turned out OK for a first try. I need to touch up the engine cowling a bit with some filing and maybe a bit of putty.
So we made it through the stiff, hard couch pull out, and woke up bright and early the next morning (6 AM) to catch our flight! Our flight schedule was Sacramento to Philadelphia (4 hour flight), a 4 hour layover in the Philadelphia airport, and then Philadelphia directly to Lisbon (6 hour 45 min flight). It had been a while since we flew to the East Coast so four hours went by slower than expected, but it was nothing compared to what we had coming!
Perhaps because prejudice is valued higher than real Christian values of equality or probably because wisdom and deliberation is absent from our lives.
Dark Chocolate Maple Pecan Pie
With its relatively small size, benign facial structure, and the funny little lump on its forehead, called a melon, the beluga whale is undeniably cute.
After the panel it was meeting time. I was totally freaked out trying to remember my one liner pitch, but as it turned out I didn't even need it. Several weeks ago we'd sent intro letters, synopsis and first 10 pages of our projects to the agents we were meeting with, and she didn't even ask for a pitch. She just launched into a discussion about my project and basically said she really liked my story and characters and thought the writing was good, etc.
If you want something done right, then do it yourself. Get yourself some machines of destruction, for the sake of defense if offense is not your cup of tea. Why? Have you looked at the newspapers recently or for a decade or so? Take a sabbatical from the world of social media, parties, hollywood, tv serieses and glamour and bite into reality. There is no security in your country. You are more llikely to die of unnatural causes at home, on the roads, in Masjids or in public places than naturally dying in bed. The Police might kill you or a speed-freak driver or your servant or a politician or even a businessman or even a student leader. It’s open season on you, because the population has boomed & life expectancy is at its highest, thus you are just another statistic. No one cares, not even the ones you pay with you taxes to protect you! So what do you do? Buy a weapon today or become a dead statistic.
*For all the prayers. It is amazing to me that so many of you have never met Caleb, or me, but you love him and you prayed for him. That just gets me all teary-eyed.
As always, M demonstrated how we should play a game and laid out the instructions on the board. When she was around, it was obvious that Alden tried his hardest to impress her. I know he's just a kid but it looks as if he has this huge crush on M. From time to time, he'd turn to the psychologist and said "I like your skirt M", "I like your shoes M. So nice!" or "I like your hair M". The best compliment was "I like you. You're so pretty".
Can Bonomo, Turkish representative has said that he will be touring the Balkan region, his schedule is: First, Zagreb in Croatia and after Zagreb he will fly to Montenegro, possibly to Podgorica and Finally to Slovenia, possibly to Ljubljana.
I am hot. This summer has been horrible, and now it is August 1st, which means that we have at least two more months of this shit. I have moved on from being frustrated and sizzled into boredom by the relentless swelter, and now I am just hot and angry. There is no rain, few clouds, and everything is dead or dying. Tempers are short, and the nights offer no respite.
I knew he would move on. But did it have to be with her?
I know, I know. Some of you are going to try to explain it all away as my age. But I REFUSE to grow up that much. I’d much rather be pixilated than old! I blame it on my house-pixies because I do believe in fairies! I do! I do!
PS. Tomorrow I'll be posting a review with Simone Elkeles. Watch out for it!
Track 1 - The Shower Scene ( Debbie Does Dallas )
Those sanctimonious corporate lackeys in DC and anywhere else that lesser creatures gather to try and administrate us right into the ground .
I started with the heavy hitter first, as I wanted to leave the foie for last to let it linger on the palate: Chicken Liver Mousse - this was incredibly fresh, smooth, substantial yet light, with rich but perfectly controlled chicken liver flavors so as not to be overly pungent. Loved the sprinkle of fresh cracked pepper on top as well for bit of crunch and slightest bit of heat.
I saw this great looking recipe on Pinterest, Betty Crockers mini Chicken and Broccoli Pie. After reading the reviews, I noticed the main theme was that the pies were tastless, so I read up on some Chicken Pot Pie recipes and decided that would add flavor to the chicken... then.. why not just add the pot pie type veggies too (except the potatoes) and so was born Mini Chicken Pot Pie Muffins. There are still a couple of tweaks to be made... but overall these turned out pretty good. Served with a side salad, it would make a good take and go lunch or supper. Oh, and I ate a "pie"/"muffin" a little later after dinner and it was really good. My biggest issue was getting the muffins out of the tin whole. I probably should have let them cool a little longer and shouldn't have used a sharp knife to loosen the edges. I will probably try these in muffin liners next time and see if that works better. It's not as much work as it looks like ;-)
N14,336,000,000 (12.8 %)
OBSTACLES: Well, the world is supposedly coming to an end…
What, you may ask, is Tom Time?
you let her come into stay
gone. And while there were some romantic moments, some touching moments and definitely some eye candy moments (namely, Channing's backside), I found the movie, as a whole, to be quite uneven. It was a long, and sometimes tiresome, game of cat and mouse. Husband tries to get his amnesiatic wife to fall back in love with him, wife takes one step forward, two steps back, parents keep interfering,…blah, blah, blah. The story just never went anywhere. I don't blame the actors. They did their best with what they were given. Rachel McAdams proved, once again, that she sparkles in
“My life has shattered, but I can’t tell you how. I can’t say it out loud yet.”
But there’s a snag. While the ship’s library is admirably well-stocked with light reading, there’s a decided shortage of primary historical source material. The internet is available even here on the Atlantic, but after one look at the cost of a minute on the Maritime Network my scholarly instincts began to take a back-seat to those of Scrooge. I decided on a cheaper option - to deconstruct purely on the basis of the decorations on the ship itself.
2. Add remaining dressing, broth, and seasonings to skillet; cook 3 to 4 min. or until heated through. Add Neufchatel; cook and stir 2 to 3 min. or until Neufchatel is melted. Stir in tomatoes, cook 3 min.
They might be getting slightly to old for that now!!
I feel Entrecard can be a positive for a new blog and can help a person get some exposure and establish getting traffic to their blog. While some of the traffic is worthwhile, most isn't. Sadly, I myself, fall into this category for the most part. I've become what 95% of the traffic is from Entrecard. That is a person who drops and runs to earn a credit, mostly for advertising purposes. The vast majority of traffic isn't reading my blog, nor have I taken the time to read many blogs myself. I've simply become robotic to earn credits. That's not what blogging is all about to me. I can't expect to get "quality" traffic if I'm not "quality" traffic myself.
Just to add to our excitement, Nichol was amazing enough to also create a video of the creation of this card for us to share with you!!! Watch as she weaves her magic!!
The other dream I keep having is of kissing people I know. Co-workers, acquaintances, old friends, current friends. There does not seem to be a correlation between whom I kiss and who (in the real world) that I actually find attractive. It's not really passionate kissing, either, and it doesn't lead to anything sexual. (And, oddly, I'm never cheating on Lee, as it's either just fine with him, or it's like before I met him.) It's just kissing that flummoxes me, even in my dream. I've even kissed girls in my dreams, and I'm super-boringly straight in real life.
I filled the 8 days I shared with my family with talk of tweets and pins, teaching them how to check-in on Facebook and explaining Twitter and Pinterest. The result? I was tagged into every restaurant we went to 3 times, and my grandpa (@MillenniumMayor) has been spam tweeting Karl Rove, Glenn Beck, Martha Maccallum, and Sarah Palin.
The song we are playing, is it God’s gospel, or is it ours? Are we testifying of ourselves or testifying of God?
Hmm, let’s not get carried away too soon. We’ve done that too many times this season already. Even Mancini claims the title race is “finished”, but the hint of cunning mind games could not really be lost in his astute Italian manner. Not sure if it was a joke, but 79 goals into the season and he says “it is important to score a goal, if it’s possible”. Right.
He added, “No other tribe has any business butting into our business and I won’t let another tribe dictate our future to us. These rich greedy tribes....we’ll definitely fight back.”
our spouses, but with children, extended family members,
I'm sorry you have to get up early both Saturday and Sunday, but I promise it'll be super fun anyway. I wouldn't invite you if I didn't love spending so much time with you!
TM 02 - Razor Wind
What do you say when you answer the phone?
It could easily be built using bought wood, plywood may be best, but if you can get hold of them a pallet or two will do just as well, I've given it a good sand and just finished it using Teak oil, but you could wax it,paint it or just leave it, obviously some kind of coating will protect the wood and it will last longer.
WRONG TURN-like slasher are scenes with official-looking people running around some military-like installation flicking lots of buttons that control lighting and release pheromones while listening to REO Speedwagon songs;
And Jax said, “No!”
However, it's going to be a lot tougher this month.
You know that feeling, when you have created something,
It seemed as though he heard me because the moment I finished my sentence, Jake lifted his thigh and gave the man a blow to his crotch. That final blow made him fall to the ground, moaning in pain. Jake then, began to run towards where I was dragged to. Then, I heard a loud noise.
I told this to my sister who replied, "Who are you and what have you done with my sister?"
He kept taking the cat further and further and the cat would always beat him home.
Well, it pretty much comes down to John Deere.
My mother’s heels snap on the marbled floor. She clicks her tongue impatiently as we walk. She wants me to hurry and make a decision, even though we’ve only just arrived. “Do you know which one you want?” she asks.
1 armor
Just about everyone that reads my blog knows Derek, but I figured every little bit helps. Derek has busted some more recent boxes. By more recent, I mean within the last two weeks. He has busted 1 hobby box of 2012 Topps Opening Day AND 1 hobby box of 2012 Topps Heritage and I believe he is throwing in an additional blaster of 2012 Heritage. He is selling by the team for the very reasonable price of $4 per team with a small additional cost for shipping. A lot of the big teams are still available.
Dates for the Information Evenings
As when a set mind, blessed by doubt,
IN RE MERCK & CO., INC. SECURITIES, DERIVATIVE & “ERISA” LITIGATION; THIS DOCUMENT RELATES TO: THE CONSOLIDATED ERISA ACTION
After a half beer and some fries we decided to hit downtown and spot some cool locations and start getting some shots untill we would come up with an epic idea.
(sparc) 3.2.514.0
Who was right??? Who was totally freaking WRONG???
As soon as we stepped in the room where the dance was going around, I saw my tango-infancy friends, those with who I learnt with, all coming back with smiles, hugs and fantastic dances.
CONGRATULATIONS, Ladies! Please leave a comment on this posting and send me your mailing information before Monday, April 16, at midnight EST!
Class-A: Kane Country Cougars, 11-14, Sixth in Midwest League West Division trail Quad Cities Bandits 13-10/Beloit Snappers & Wisconsin Timber Rattlers 14-11 by three games
The minister later released a press statement attempting to clarify her position on arms sales to Libya.
The next time you find yourself about to step out of your comfort zone and into the gauntlet, remember, it’s…just…20…seconds. Perhaps the reason only 20 seconds is required is because once you start, you have no choice, but to take a paralegal swan dive, because you’re going to do it…or die trying. After all, you are a paralegal. That’s how we roll. It’s simply how we’re wired. You’re either all in or walking away before the gun goes off. There is no try. We do or we do not. Period. As Napoleon Bonaparte so succinctly stated, “If you start to take Vienna – take Vienna.” And if you’re a paralegal…take it by storm.
And beings are micro-causal effects of subliminal dreams projected on the macrospace
Finally, we visited Karadozbeg Mosque (Karadozbegova Dzamija) where we climbed the minaret for a view of the city.
Anyhoo, I can see me and my Diagonal Insert are in for a long, happy, and fruitful relationship.
It started out with two like minded people, and then we turned into three and then along came four!
music. . . Sweet Leaf, John Hackett / Moodi Drury
But that's a topic for another day. For now, let's stick to putting the two-headed monster out of its misery.
Gilmour, I.H.J.L. (1978) Inside right. London: Quartet.
09. Verso Il Campanile (00:52)
I think my mom got there around 9:00, just as I was telling them that I couldn’t not push. It felt like forever waiting for them to take apart the bed and get the stirrups out and all, but it couldn’t have taken long. I was grateful but exhausted when it was time to start pushing, and I had that same feeling like they were all supposed to tell me what exactly to do and no one was telling me. I pushed and focused on not tensing up my face, but my legs were so weak all I could think was that there was no way I could do this. I knew I had hours ahead of me and I had only pushed a couple times and I was totally drained. But then they told me he was coming. I didn’t believe them. I guess that was the running theme for my labor experience. Even though I wanted so desperately to have a different birth experience than I’d had before, I didn’t really believe that I would. So when they told me he was coming, instead of thinking “Okay, I can do this” I was thinking ”Stop lying to me, I know I have to do this 100 more times and I don’t want to get my hopes up.”
8
And I have a slight obsession with ruffles, yet my machine won't ruffle fabric on it's own so frustration sometimes runs high.
Smash, Glee, A Chorus Line, Violet on the Runway.
The whole thing is perfect, and that includes The Rocky Point Club, which, in my experience, has always been a nice, elegant, sedate beach club, one of our town’s little “secret places”. And no, I’m not applying for membership there, I swear.
God has been working throughout the entirety of history, turning perceived evils into greater goods than we could possibly have imagined. He can do it for you as well. What He needs is your trust. Imagine, if God can use evil men to propel His purposes, how much more can He use a vessel yielded to Him for His glory?
Come along to The Valley Market this Sunday, April the 29th, Little black Crow has some new little paintings for sale...Folk Fairies series..each little fairy has her own special affirmation just for you!
"I think it's a symptom of this male-dominated political system we have where progressives and moderates have been conditioned to hate each other in this city," she said. "We all have to practice kindness."
Take a moment to slow down and make some muffins. Muffins are always simple and fast...they aren't called "quick breads" for nothing.
Sometimes I fear
One of the things I've done, is added a page on the top of this blog for Eris Approved Blogs. Do you see it up there? No? Well then just click this you dummy.
Man is not ideally threatened by the concept of Karma, to do good deeds. And neither is it worth doing so. You don’t have to make a to-do list every day and then behave according to it. I believe life is the most passionate when you live spontaneously, act impulsively. Karma is neither inspiring nor is it compulsive. Then why Karma?!
A good symptom of a spiritual awakening is when materialistic scientists like Michael Gazzaniga have fellow scholars who contradict his views; one of them in Iain McGilchrist, and it’s good to end an article with one of his speeches: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MbAJMi5el5I.
Grace, the soft place our palms are meeting.
It’s those sleepy, cute mornings when he shuffles along the corridor, rubbing his eyes and seeming, just for a moment or two, like any other child. It’s the occasional calmness and the moments of good, lucid behaviour. It’s having him sit with you on a sunny August morning when you’re upset for no really good reason, and having him do nothing except cuddle and help you cry. It’s the unplanned moments, the buns in cafes, the treats from charity shops, the computer game displays in department stores. It’s an unscheduled sit-in during the evening’s Doctor Who session. It’s watching him run away from crashing surf, screaming with laughter. It’s the grin when he dressed up at the Roald Dahl museum. It’s watching progress, and applauding milestones. It’s the long but steady climb uphill.
It’s crucial that you demonstrate patience when it comes to real estate agents. In many cases, they are going to tell you certain things that you don’t want to hear. Though you can disagree, it is often advisable to listen to their suggestions.
So next week is my last 1/2 in Cleveland. I haven't even looked at the course. I'm more excited to go cheer my sister on to her BQ! I'm hoping and praying to the good Lord above for "Ideal Conditions". I can't take much more rain/cold/wind! I'll take 1 out of 3 at this point! I don't have a special outfit planned for this one. I just want to get it done! The kids will be staying with my Mom and Dad, so hubby and I will have a night alone. Looking forward to it. Hope everyone had a great weekend and Happy Mother's Day to all those hard working, running Mamas!
And here is where you have a problem in the novel. This doesn't make sense. FBI agents don't solve every bank robbery. In fact I think they solve about half. I don't understand why not solving a bank robbery would be Gina's ultimate failure.
Let’s see, a socialist leader that punishes business that goes against his wishes and rewards those that do his bidding. Hmmm… Sound familiar? Want to drill for oil? Go screw yourself. Oh? Solyndra? Here’s another half a billion dollars. How much did GE pay in taxes recently?
June 27 – Milwaukee, WI – Quater’s Rock’n'Roll Palace
"Set a guard, O LORD, over my mouth;
Sam, Cafe Proprietor: Chili without beans.
Every second is a highlight
d. Ride a Golf Cart into W00tstock
Mary Ann & Mother @ RocknRecipes
you would be sad,
The down side is that I’ve been having some back/chest pains lately, and after working out, I felt the pain a little more, but no fear-my doctor’s appointment is tomorrow. In reflection, probably should have gotten the doctor’s approval first, but I don’t think it’s my heart or anything like that. We’ll see soon enough…
North End residents have no problem with the rest of the city traipsing through their neighbourhood to visit the waterfront.
Here’s what you have to do to win: Leave a comment on the blog (that’s right here) about the best birthday gift you ever received. For me, it’s this year: my husband is graduating from seminary!
2. Youngest daughter Sybil learns that love interest / young chauffeur Tom Branson’s successive efforts against the army all relate to a relative killed by a soldier for being a rebel or possibly Irish, efforts that culminate in a dramatic but failed attempt to pour a “pot of slop” on a visiting heroic general.
This month look for bbq and grilling how to info, daily BBQ recipes on anything from recipes for BBQ sauce to desserts.
Recorded @: 24 bit 44.1K frequency recorded
There is a Starbucks only a minute’s walk from the casa, however the prices, remain the same as they are in the U.S. (when you account for exchange rates) In Buenos Aires, finding another café to replace Starbucks with is simply a matter of finding another street corner. The problem however, is finding one that fills much of the same purposes. Our rough criteria was as follows:
This is based on reports from a photographer, Ziv Oren, who lives in the neighborhood. The police did not alert the journalists as it usually does when a crime is committed.
I’m exhausted but I’m still going to try to remember a time when God was faithful
No one even calls you St Michael any more.
This is one of the images I had completed and posted on my Show Me,
tip 4. before you dart out the door like a mom who sniffed leftover missoni at target, ask the lister a few preguntas:
In the autism community we shout at the top of our lungs for others outside the community to be aware of autism, be aware of the differences in those on the autism spectrum. We want the world to accept those differences!
I'd be fascinated to know if anyone has read this book. Or indeed any of her other books - I understand she's not that happy about the previous two published by Harper Collins either. Apart from that, I think it's an interesting discussion on its own. How do you select a book - does the cover ever come into it? Have you ever felt misled by a book's cover, or the way a book has been marketed?
and cardiac systems.
Cardstock: Early Espresso, Cajun Craze, Vanilla, Well Woren DSP
just last night I was crying as I thought about leaving today
I love to collect stones and even more, love to paint on them. These were picked up along the sides of the Quesnel river around Cottonwood house.
Then Christ goes on to point out a very solemn fact: “The disciple is not above his master, nor the servant above his lord.” If they hated the LORD, the God of heaven, how much more will they hate those that follow Him and worship Him. We can expect no better treatment than Christ was given, which was rejection, mockery, blasphemy, beating, and murder. We read about persecution as if it were a foreign and unnatural, heinous thing. It is simply to be expected. Now Christ does not end the sermon there. He goes on to say
This blog has been influenced by two movies I’ve seen recently: Blue Valentine and Shame. It is influenced by all those silly fairy tales fed to me when I was younger.
- I sold out of baked goods at the farmer's market for the first time
The Rescue
Tonight is the night to regroup, plan and get back on track.
We moved in, down the street from our best friends!
3. Allowing the negative thoughts and chatter to spend time in my mind, slowing down my progress and growth.
harsh and direct,
And what we stand to gain. —D. De Haan
Level 14: MP Cost: 24, Damage: 280%, Number of Attacks: 4, 24% to inflict darkness on the enemy and lower it’s accuracy by 14% for 68 seconds. The last attack is critical.
For organizations with a message to share customized wristbands is the innovative and fresh choice. The potential of these plain bands to notify, alert, promote and raise awareness is being harnessed by charitable trust, sport clubs and businesses globally. iphone 4 case wholesale
One should sustain this recollection.
I still love and collect dolls... and was surprised to see them displayed in the library
The little man has inherited big brother's Woody costume this year, along with his love of "Toy Story". He's a man of few words, but he can shout out "Yee-hah Cowboy!" with the best of them.
my marriage is working....
Of course, Obama is extremely charismatic and articulate. It's also easy to see that he's very early in his crafting of a stump speech. I was kind of surprised at how many times he said 'uh,' and paused and seemed to have to gather his thoughts. He's so smart and has his positions so well organized in his head that he probably still believes that he can get up on stage and wing it extemporaneously, and to some extent he can. But I will be very surprised if he doesn't start forming a much better template soon. He's in for the long haul and he's going to start getting tired. There are times that it's better to perform than to think, and I think he has yet to learn that.
I finally (finally!) made more granola. This time with millet and dried cranberries instead of raisins. This granola has such a great mild not too sweet taste. I do 1/4-1/3 cup servings and get the most bang for my buck when combined with Greek Yogurt. Milk is good but I find myself hungry way sooner than when I have it with yogurt. I’m not the biggest fan of the consistency of greek yogurt but it really is satisfying and I’m not tempted to snack too much or too soon between meals.
But then I would sound just like my mum about 30 years ago.
What would we do without them? Sometimes the only thing that keeps me going on a first draft is my alpha readers cheering me on, bugging me for the next chapter, demanding to know what happens next. Don’t get me wrong – they can be critical, too. They let me know if a chapter lacks enough emotional impact or if one of the characters has acted out of character. Their initial feedback after each chapter helps me gauge how I’m doing … and where I’m failing.
I have to sit back and wonder how many hoisters drank from the above tin tankard back in the Revolutionary War days. Too, many ales probably put them in a real daze.
In the best cases, it’s generally not a good idea to read the book after seeing the film – everything has already been imagined and depicted for you, it leaves no room for you to make up your own mind about what is happening or will happen. And that, for me, is a large part of the magic of reading. In the case of Perfume, not only had I already seen the film, I had adored it. It was my favourite film for at least eight months! (And this was back in the day when my favourite film changed every month or so…)
AVENGERS VS X-MEN (NICK BRADSHAW VARIANT). Pretty gorgeous on the whole. It’s a little boob-tacular for me, but I appreciate some of the details – especially how that thin pink fabric is burning off of her. Pretty cool.
Asia Cottom, 11, Washington, D.C.
The Kenneys have several turbines within a kilometer of their waterfront property and 36 within several kilometers. They sought to have the assessment of their property reduced, which would mean a reduction in taxes.
Sven Vath
I found 2 of these chairs at GW for $14.99 (for BOTH).
Don't you just envision you and your dream guy cruising around the island in a hot red mustang convertible, with the top down, and the ocean breeze whipping through your hair? The sun beating down on you while you soak up the adventure and relaxation that is Kauai?
Here is my little friend that serenades me ..... One of my neighbours I believe feeds a robin sultanas from her hand. I wonder if this one is the one. I could try but don't want to tempt him or make him too tame as I have cats.
I watched AVENGERS the day of release in a 3D theater, and I hate both a crowded theater and Real 3D technology. I don’t like sitting with mouthy high school kids and I don’t understand why anyone thinks depth of field gives you more than watching a darkened print takes away. Smulders didn’t leave a huge impression on me that first time amid all of the other awesomeness so I wondered what the second viewing would bring.
“Forgive…”
Over the last seventy odd years there have been extensive research publications and debate, within the scientific community regarding the physiology and biology of meditative and mystical states of awareness, encompassing many traditions of so called meditative practice and finding stunning neurological and biological correlates to the subjectively related experiences of the individuals studied.
Oh, yes, and Coach Frank and player MJ's volleyball team had their first games today at the Boys and Girls Club. Everybody's skills are coming along great -- there were several volleys that had the audience on the edges of their seats. This is a 7th-8th grade division, so they play with the regulation (big) net, but the rules are still weird to force the games to go fast. The as-yet-unnamed team won one and lost two.
Ends on May 25, 2012 - k*
To catch up on the day’s news
Again I have not been able to get any housework done or any of my list done at all really. First thing this morning, (after breakfast of course), I went to look at a house my husband and I will be placing an offer on come Monday. Since my husband works out of town I needed to take pictures of it for him. I wont go into details about why it took nearly two hours longer than it should have, suffice it to say that it did. By the time I left I had to stop to get lunch at a fast food place for me and the kiddos before taking an hour drive down to my family's place for my niece's baptism.
I have nothing against cell phones. What I have a problem with is the incivility they create and the total aspect of sheer rudeness that results. It's bad enough that people yak non-stop on them in their cars, but hey, at least we don't have to listen to them.
Endless negotiations. Not with God or the universe, with him! 50/50 split of everything is hard when you are dealing with multiple countries. I have made it easy – You keep that money, I’ll keep the cars. I keep the furniture and the value is equal to your shipment so I pay for that. I’m trying to keep this as simple as possible. He will actually come out ahead in the 50/50 split because the “stuff” isn’t an equal split. He will end up with more of the stuff than I will. And I really don’t care. It’s just stuff. He can have all of it if he wants. If it will fit in a box, take it! But he keeps wanting to hash over things we have previously talked about a billion times and starts accusing me of mishandling the money and on and on and on. I am about to get ugly with this negotiation.
This week I would like to share some of the "healthy but looks real yummy" snack and meal ideas I have found. I have been eating rather poorly for quite a while now (okay, okay, my eating habits suck and I need to change them). One of the problems is, all the recipes I see and end up pinning look really good but are not good for me. So I recently found some recipes I would like to try and thought I would share.
RingMaster 26/04/2012
Noon – 2 pm
I wore this to go out to eat with my boyfriend, surprisingly most of the outfit was free! (Perks of being an intern!) Thanks to my wonderful bosses. I got these wedges as a present to myself for making dean's list for Spring semester.
In my mid-20s that changed. I decided I needed to lose weight and to accomplish that goal, I started exercising. I started out by walking, then stair-climbing. At the time I lived in Hamilton, near the escarpment, so I didn't even need to belong to a gym. I had 300+ steps available to climb right there, in the great outdoors. Eventually I decided to try running, and to my surprise, I discovered I was a pretty decent runner. I was never going to win any races, but I did okay. School had made me feel like just "doing okay" was pointless. As an adult, I learned that doing my best at fitness had personal rewards.
I've been harbouring a little secret. Will not 'harbouring' as such. Probably more to the point of whether I should blog about it or what people might think of me. My husband left our marriage back in mid January. Now, don't so 'ohh' or have pity on me. It was a mutual decision. I've basically been single for quite a few years while we've both been living together in the house. It's been a hard slog but one that I managed quite well on my own.
For a long time I didn't think I could be a lifestyle Himegyaru because I didn't dress up daily or was I like the girls I saw in Himegyaru YouTube videos. I wake up at 5 AM to go to a school full of people I can't stand. It's just not worth putting my hair into a massive Hime beehive and putting on Gyaru makeup (not to mention I wear glasses at school, I can't exactly have giant lashes ~_~;). I'm not attracted to Gyaruo guys at all (I prefer my boys with tattoos and my girls with shaved heads) and I'd rather go to a rave than a tea party. It wasn't until a friend of mine noticed that the way I carried myself about, my taste in certain things, and how classy I can be was when I realized I was a lot more princessy than I thought. So I decided that this part of the guide won't be a manual to how to throw your current life down on the curb and start an change everything, but it's some ways to add a bit of Hime in your daily life ^^;
There is absolutely a place for these fellowship times together. No question about it. But that’s what they are: times of light, fairly superficial fellowship. What most of these sorts of events have in common, in my limited experience, are a very brief opening prayer or blessing, a shallow devotional, and lots of stories about the Korean War (which are usually much more interesting than the devotional).
“I was robbed,” asserted Maurice Griffin (in video below), who quit his non-union carpentry job to do the 15-week, Forest City Ratner-funded program that began last August.
Add lemon juice to syrup mixture and stir. Pop in the ice cream maker until thickened, about 25-30 minutes.
Whatever you do, whether scrapping at an event or just scrapping at home with some friends or even by yourself, enjoy yourself !!!
To the rescue came Emma, my wonderful teen daughter.
With her oldest child approaching the age Janie was when it happened, coupled with the fact that it was twenty-five years, made a few of them nervous. She could see it in their eyes just before they looked away.
and here's where my day today ties into the idea of respect, as mister gordon states above: bonzo knows better than me when he's sleepy. he just does. he's in his body. as always, i'm watching for his signals and actions, keeping to the rhythm of our day when naptime usually falls. but just because he's usually tired around noon doesn't necessarily mean he'll always be tired around noon. i make naptime available every single day and guide him towards it – sometimes effortlessly and sometimes with a little nudge. and usually he takes it even if it means he just eventually gets there after initially not being super inclined.
So, here are some pictures of the finished (still need to add handles!) armoire:
don't get me wrong I love what I do working out new designs playing with fabric but what did it for me this week was....Raw Applique..for the life of me I just can't get it Right..in fact I was determined to get it right and stuffed up my new blocks as in previous post...Yep in the Bin!
As of lately I've been reading some great contemporary romance reads, and Kristan Higgins' My One and Only was no different, thankfully enough, as not only did it contain some sweet romantic subplots, but a hilarious undertone as well as a fast paced and unique road trip.
I pray that you learn from my sin, and run far from it. I know for certain our God is a mighty God. He is awesome and there is no sin you or I can, or have ever committed, that is too great for Him to forgive and cleanse you from. God took me from being a woman who was a snare to my husband, to a woman he now wears proudly as his crown, his jewel, his greatest earthly treasure; all because our King Jesus is refining me, so that I am free to shine His glory!
In the summer of 1927, Ernest Phipps and His Holiness Quartet, all members of the Free Holiness Pentecostal Church around Corbin, Kentucky, journeyed to Bristol, Tennessee, to record for Ralph Peer for the historical “Bristol Sessions”. These sessions were considered the “Big Bang” of real American Country Music recordings mostly because Jimmy Rodgers and The Carter Family,two of the most successful and influential early Country artists were discovered there. During these few days in in July and August 1927, Mr Peer recorded a large sample of vernacular music from the South, String bands,banjo players, singers and religious bands. Among the religious performers, the most exciting sound came from Phipps and His Holiness Quartet, who sang in the fervent and vigorous style of the Holiness Church, accompanied by string instruments and clapping. This type of religious performance evolved from “The Great Awakening”, when “American Protestant rebelled against Old World Puritanism ” and spread a new spirit of religious fervor and emotion, which lead to the foundation of new religious groups like the Pentecostal and Holiness Churches. Like in many african-american churches, the congregation was invited to sing and rejoice with all his heart and sometimes reach a kind of ecstatic experience through the process.
In 2011, a shattering force comprised of diversified heavy metal veterans arose amongst the hills of California, rapidly emerging as new, refreshed musical project ATTIKA 7. Poised to bludgeon up the charts past today’s stark contemporaries, the fan-dubbed “super group” is set to release their debut full-length album, Blood of My Enemies on July 31, 2012 with Rocket Science Ventures in the United States.
…create 11 questions to ask the people you tag
The sense that she diffuses of a simple, unselfish, patient nature and of impulsive tenderness of heart, however,cannot have been missed by anybody with eyes to see. And she crowns all by speaking the English language with a beauty that has seldom been equalled.”
.... tonight.
Is it just me? Am I really such a monumental brute for being briefly tickled by radio broadcaster George Hook’s wordplay in a recent address to a rugby club?
Michael Wirth
Reginald licked down his front left paw a few times to calm himself and after a pause that included a put upon stare into a middle distance, proceed to wash properly. A proper wash starts with paws, then head, the sides, the legs, the back, the tail, the underside and the gentleman bits at the end. Bertie never seemed to manage a proper wash. No matter how many times he was told and shown and told again. The brat. If Reginald hadn’t promised Her he’d look after Bertie, this whole undertaking would be a whole lot easier. A whole. Lot.
I’m not trying to place blame on Western society as a whole, but within the first year of experiencing its effects and the negative emphasis on body image, I spiraled into a deep depression. I had never had to conform to fashion, body image, or alter my attitude to suit a societal norm. I had never been exposed to media or the “celebrity” effect, and as a result I went into shock (physically, mentally, nutritionally, and spiritually). I felt insurmountable pressure to be a certain way and reacted as any 10 year old girl would… fighting for survival. This new way of life ended up inducing triggers, exacerbated by perfectionism that created a type of adolescent stress. These triggers included interpersonal discrepancies, low interpersonal esteem, depressive affect, and dietary restraint.
A few weeks ago, in preparation for the new movie, Dana and I watched the 1984 edition so that we could do a comparison. Of course, the 80's movie is very, well, 80's and we were not too sure what to expect going into the new one and were very pleasantly surprised. Below we present: Footloose vs. Footloose.
Being a bit of twenty first century gypsy I get itchy feet staying in one place for too long. Sometimes I decide to go travelling on a whim so I have fled the cold in England and am back in Andalucia for a short while.
UPDATE 3/5/12: I noticed that most news agencies (Catholic ones, anyway) have converted $250,000 to £150,000 when covering this story. Having consulted with several currency converters, the average sum that I seemed to come up with was £154,000, if not slightly more. I am therefore quite sure that, given a good deal, $250,000 can be converted to at least £154,000, if not £155,000 - though maybe I'm wrong about this?
…has everyone lost their minds? IT’S JUST SOME CRAP A CRAZY OLD MAN FOUND ON THE GROUND. HOW DOES THAT EQUAL WORLDWIDE PHENOMENON? Pfft. Next you’re gonna be telling me the rival candy companies are actually going to hire some doofus to investigate The Stuff for them and figure out what it’s made of...
According to KILI, the Pipeline trucks are refusing to turn around claiming they have corporate rights that supercede any other laws
Big explosion today. My husband has been on the path of never ending asshole and I'm so fed up. He and my oldest son go around in circles. I am so sick of the bitching and arguing and bad attitudes. I didn't agree to this when I agreed to let my husband move back home.
I don't care if you stop
Best Fanzine: StarShipSofa edited by Tony C. Smith
I sort of ran out of color ink, of course!, right before the card making process began.
I highly recommend bookmarking and following this blog; as well as reading the three best seller books of David Livingstone, together with the Essential reading lists:
"It's just another day."
What a wonderful image from our sponsor Michele Perkett - I love all the flowers in the image, it looks and feels so cheerful. I layered the image on Pink Petticoat papers and coloured it with Copics. A little bit of stitching, some paper flowers and a little gem complemented the card.
It certainly feels like it.
overpaid, but certainly said they are nowhere near productive enough,” and continued, "We've reduced entry teachers pay by 15 per cent plus – they're not overpaid. But still, they could be more productive, we could get greater outcomes from them." In other words, if there is a problem with Irish education, the problem lies with inefficient teachers. This is just as the Tories in Britain and the Republicans in the US claim – German evidence notwithstanding – that the problem with those nations’ economies lies entirely
***The opinions shared on this blog are mine alone, and are not endorsed by the Kanas City Zoo.
Cost: 20 Euros (Concessions: 18 Euros)
I have a card today, to show you, but there are lots of other creative masterpieces from the rest of the DT, just waiting for you to come look at them! Head over to Catch The Bug to check them out!
And last, but not least, I'm so excited about this one. So this is Music Inspired By The Story. Basically the bible was taken and written into a book called The Story so it actually reads like one solid story. So various Christian artists came together to make this album including Natalie Grant, Mandisa, Bart Millard (Mercy Me), Mark Hall (Casting Crowns), Matthew West, Mac Powell, Jeremy Camp and many others (23 total). There are some awesome songs on this. So far my faves are "Alive" by Natalie Grant - all about Mary Magdalene and then "Born for This" by Mandisa, all about Esther. Ugh so good!
Hi Everyone
Unfortunately, Mario Gutierrez is hard to resist. After one weird conversation at a bar, and one meaningful look across their empty beer bottles, Carter isn’t sure he’s not the one flipping for his friend. They’re both tops, so to make this work, one will have to give in and roll over. Carter will have to come to terms with his past before he can look to a future with his best friend.
Me and the hubby post race! A big accomplishment for both of us. We trained for this while juggling a baby. Each of us sacrificing time to go on those runs early early in the morning and long solitude Saturday runs while the other stayed with Will.
The Irish were unusual in that Irish women were as likely to emigrate as men, atypical compared to other nationalities which either exported single men or families. Even where these women appeared to travel alone, a closer look at the shipping records will reveal there may have been cousins or neighbours on board. In the later years of emigration, they would have family in Australia who may have sent their remittance for emigration. It pays to look beyond just the name you’re researching to see who they may have travelled with…they weren’t as alone as we sometimes think.
Another 10 minutes (over 20 minutes she’s been in there)
Hi girls...
But I understand. Not everybody loves to exercise. And even though my friend, "J" makes me laugh and be encouraged right down to my toes when I see her, she has my official permission NOT to love pilates or any form of exercise.
Detective Superintendent Martin Andrew said: “Following an allegation that nomination forms for the mayoral elections had been fraudulently filled in, a police investigation was launched.
When we bought the house the colour was somewhat vibrant
When we got home, I had a little time to play and these are the result. I love the jade crystal rondells in the second necklace - so sparkly but my photographic skills don't do it justice!
If you’re a writer, write. And if you’re a reader, keep reading. We need you!
On Saturday, two Molotov cocktails were thrown at the offices of Equitalia in Livorno, Tuscany, and severely damaged the front of the building after they blew off. Moreover, a letter bomb, which did not blast, was sent to the organization’s offices in Rome on Friday.
All of a sudden, it was like Harry Potter and the picture came to life and the crowd parted to reveal my Dad in his favourite "poofy" shirt (black cotton short-sleeve with big white butterflies on it ... a kinda hippie version of the classic Hawaiian. He loved it and actually picked the nickname for it himself). He was standing with a close family friend and co-worker he'd known for almost 40 years.
1/2 cup sun-dried cherries
Just be sure to link us back here either to your own blog or to whatever gallery you use. Also, tell us who/which layout you picked.
- I also managed to get all of my grades ready and verified before I was called on the phone and told to do it. :)
manage attendance: it’s time to start talking to your employees about their plans. You may keep your policy simple – maybe have a ‘first come, first served’ policy for booking leave – but it may help to draw up some guidelines
For ever.
As far as I can tell, the guy that took D.J. had no intentions of harming him. D.J. said the guy kept calling him his bargaining chip or “the key”. My guess is that the S.O.B. was just looking for a way to get at some of our supplies to stay alive himself.
Moderator: Paul Soukup (Santa Clara University)
The US firm conceded that the picture – which depicts the US First Lady with the features of a monkey – was offensive but resisted calls to take it down.
I snapped his picture and attached this message:
Bettina Browne, 49, Atlantic Beach, N.Y.
Miles this week: 6.25
Maison de Cupcakes is hosting the first edition of a brand new event called Nigella Forever - this time's theme is centred around Seasonal Sensations - "anything Christmassy, anything celebratory for New Year, do party canapes or even wintery comfort food for snow days".
For example: Time passes here that I don’t recall.
The three heroines this time round are three high schoolers, Sakai Wakana (CV: Takagaki Ayahi), Miyamoto Konatsu (CV: Seto Asami) and Okita Sawa (CV: Hayami Saori).
before a dramatic kamikaze
My heart remains in a heavy place so I continue to be obedient and write from my heavy heart. Over the last few years several people have asked me a question that has always stuck in my head. They all asked it a little differently but they were all saying the same thing when it came down to it. They asked...
"Efforts of harmonization in the field of copyright law have only brought partial results for certain aspects of the law of copyright in the Member States of the European Union. Therefore, at a meeting at the chateau of Wittem in 2002, scholars across the European Union, invited on the initiative of three Dutch universities (Radboud University of Nijmegen, University of Amsterdam and Leiden University) started a network project with the aim of drafting model
During a visit to the Arches Centre in East Belfast, the Minister saw at firsthand how the trial is progressing. He said: “This is the first time that such a trial has been undertaken in Western Europe and is a major coup for Northern Ireland. Although we know that fluoride varnish works in clinically controlled environments, it has never been tested as to whether these topical fluorides are effective in ‘real life’ settings such as dental practices.
“He had a great impact on many lives. He’s changed my life in many ways, I’m sure.”
________________________________________________________________________________
As little as five minutes of ‘green exercise’ could produce an increase in self-esteem and improvements in mental well-being, with the greatest benefits being experienced by children. Spending time outdoors is very important for children, especially in an age where gaming technology seems to dominate their attention on a daily basis. It has even been shown that outside play can produce improvements in attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, learning ability, creative ability and mental, psychological and emotional well-being.
-23 39 29.53 , +144 8 49.58
“Fever” tells the dramatic, and ultimately tragic, story of Little Willie John. With hits like the original, 1956 version of “Fever,” “Need Your Love So Bad,” “Talk to Me, Talk to Me,” “Sleep” and “Leave My Kitten Alone,” it appeared that Little Willie John had achieved R&B immortality in just a few short years of fame before his early death. Musicians such as Stevie Wonder, James Brown, Marvin Gaye, B.B. King, Elvis Presley, and The Beatles all consider John an influence and a major contributor to the music that became R&B and rock n’ roll.
Off to strike....in the rain!
Isn’t it a pity
It's always amusing to watch Parisians go about the business of getting fit. As with most activities requiring actual physical exertion, the Parisians go about it with about the same amount of gusto as most of the rest of the world reserves for the eating of offal (ie: not very much).
I'm so excited to move into spring time and new creations, and as always love fan input! Do you have something you would love to see?Are you a Facebook fan to get a first hand sneak peak of items before they are available on Etsy? Like the fan page to get a front row spot. Onward to facebook fan world :)
It feels a bit weird coming into the rehearsals so late on, but also wonderful! I can’t wait to see what they’ve done with it. So I’ll be London bound at the end of April to catch the a rehearsal and then the dress rehearsal before it heads out to Brighton and then onto London so watch out for it if it comes your way!
invisible lips hidden by beard and dripping pieces of blood
Top Camera App
I was living out of my car, I didn't think I would need a place to stay because I was going
The incident will be discussed at a CNSC meeting today.
HAVE A HAPPY HOLIDAYYYYYYYYYY
Brush hoagie rolls inside and out with olive oil and sprinkle lightly with sea salt. Place on grill or in oven until lightly golden brown.
Paul (my father in law) is a great guy! He's always first to praise. He's loving and kind to me and my family. He's a great example.
My girlfriend who only played a wargame once in her life was pretty confident about it and wanted to try it. Seems like I was showing my excitement about the nice rules and avoided me the solo experience. Anyway, I made a couple of forces using Therians, and U.N.A. troops with a Warhammer 40K Chimera tank. They passed for New Israelis and Slammers in the army lists. The forces were as follows:
Major premise: whatever is ridiculous is true.
Think about those questions.
For the artist, working with Icelanders has been drastically different than his experience with the French. “France is a country with a lot of baggage,” Crotty explains, “socially, historically, culturally. It’s interesting; it’s just not my baggage. So I didn’t want to realize my project in that environment. People here are far more open-minded. Everyone has had a game attitude. They don’t ask why things are happening; they just want to know what’s happening.”
The Italian Job (1969) as Charlie Croker
Anaru: (As I see it, nothing has changed. We seem still as friendly as we used to be…)
For every emotion, thought and physical sensation, ask the question, “Is this energy mine?” If it is not yours, then the energy will lessen and even go away. This takes practice, but eventually it becomes habit. When my son was about ten, we were driving in the car and I heard him sigh. I asked, “What’s up?” He said, “I started feeling sad and I asked, ‘Is this energy mine?’ and I realized that it belonged to the woman in the car next to us. Then I stopped feeling sad.” How cool is that?
Pudgy fingers fluttering.
Who is fat in this country?
It is always more difficult to Tie Up Loose Ends that one anticipates.
Bling: KaiserCraft
Yasmin Chaudhry, 26, killed her baby girl by plunging into a bucket of water at 3 a.m. Skype video call with her British partner. She said she wanted to discipline her baby for "disobeying her". She told paramedics the baby had fallen into the bucket by accident. The girl was pronounced dead next day.
So maybe it’s time we all took stock of what we actually believe regarding suffering and persecution. This is probably the hardest thing for me to fully grasp, and I have a feeling it will take at least a lifetime, if not more, to understand and perfect, through God’s grace.
I scream
Among those who saw his video were FAA inspectors, who slapped him with an official letter complaining he took the video illegally because portable electronic devices must be turned off during “critical” phases of a flight, such as takeoffs, and can’t be used during an in-flight emergency.
d. “protect and advance the right of the people to a balanced and healthful ecology in accord with the rhythm and harmony of nature.” (Section 16, Article II, id.)
One guy in particular caught my eye. We actually he caught a bunch of our eyes because he had on a Michael Bolton shirt and ear muffs. One of my coworkers friends went up and tried to get the shirt from him and he instantly said."I am not retarded." Just in case we thought he was due to the ear muffs and Bolton shirt. We then played Lovers and Friends for him which he knew every word to. He basically made my night with that saying. His girlfriend was a good sport to as we egged on his asinine behavior.
Peanut Butter Cocoa Brownies
Both of these pictures were taken at their one month checkup. Preston (left) looks like Glen, Porter (right) looks a lot like my brothers baby pictures. I'm just waiting for a girl that looks like me, yes a mini PAIGE! Ha, but not for a VERY, VERY, VERY long time.
Curtis Mayfield Superfly US
Tomorrow will be a great day. I open. I will eat well. I will live life to the fullest and have a smile on my face. People will see me for who I am and I will accept those around me.
“You know what Wolf? I don’t think I could work with you. You are delusional, girl. There is nothing positive about what you said to your co-workers. You just make things worse.”
It’s true. Those things can take you out of the running for a job. I’ve seen that happen in newsrooms and in academia. If you are on the job market or want to go to graduate school, make sure those letters are clear and clean.
“It was one of the queer things of life that you saw a person every day for months and were so intimate with him that you could not imagine existence without him; then separation came, and everything went on in the same way, and the companion who had seemed essential proved unnecessary.”
1-16 Little Rock, AR Alltel Arena
What do you think? Is this perfectly ok to do, or do you think that sketch challenge participants should try to stick closer to the sketches? I'd appreciate any feedback :)
A little birdie told me that my niece Jaelynne-is fairly close to being banned from watching the movie, "Cloudy with a Chance of Meatballs" because it makes her super hungry! She spent yesterday afternoon making countless requests for various food items such as "a steak" and "yellow jello"...and became very upset when her requests weren't immediately filled. Now, there's a girl after my own heart. ;)
Out of our 25,000 genes only a few contain the instructions for making hemoglobin proteins. The remaining genes do other stuff. But tonight I will prove again that evolution is taking place. I will make it clear that it is the strongest the smartest the fittest the most desirable that survive.
Obviously there are many other positive things that happen in a face-to-face meeting environment. If you are seeking ways to build relationships try capturing attention. A new space can be just the novelty that triggers interest, attention and sparks the positive emotional response that leads your organization to bigger and better things with your meetings.
The country of 11 million people now has more than 371,000 people working for themselves, according to government figures.
Taking the dogs out for their pre-feeding walk, they are full of it this am. Ollie and Roxy have been chasing each other, barking, running, more barking. At least it is dry today…more dry days please…
Christians should have nothing to do with evil
15 Dark Globe 2:57 July 27, 1969 Choral Version - Malcolm Jones 1987 Clean Mix
Paper - Pemberly B&T, Colonial White & Indian Corn Blue cardstock
I wrote this poem for you
De Wet jnr estimated that there were between 10 and 15 attackers.
So, in honour of such an excellent day, I’m going to share a few fun facts about the films and their making. I’m sure most of you awesome people out there will already know them, but it’s for the good of the many.
Amazon France: 1
Dio recorded three albums with Elf, then joining up with Deep Purple’s guitarist and started to focus on a band called Rainbow. Dio stayed with Rainbow for a three records and decided to move ahead because of creative differences between himself and the band.
5. A medium once told me that I am a reincarnation of Cecil Beaton (look him up too, yes HIM, stop laughing)
See that brighter red in the center?
Midnite, Rising Appalachia, Govinda, The Polish Ambassador
Just curious--how did your foot with the plantar fasciitis hold up to the 500,000 mile walk?
Oh primitive feelings, are you reading me?
So the Lemon Pudding Cake was a bit of a FAIL. Not at all pretty. The taste and consistency were OK, but I love lemon desserts and this was no lemon bar. It was heavy and dense. Too much cake, not enough pudding. In every way it was just too much. I don’t believe I can put the blame solely on me, nor Betty Crocker, nor my use of all fat-free dairy products. It was just a perfect storm of fail. An aside: the cake got better the longer it sat in the fridge.
Welcome to Round Two of the Christmas Cards & Cookies Blog Hop! There was so much response to the Christmas Cards & Cookies Blog Hop that it had to be split between two weekends. Round One was held last weekend. Round Two is this weekend, beginning on Saturday, Dec. 10th, through Sunday, Dec. 11th. We have a talented group of women who love papercrafting and baking. Each of them is sharing a recipe for a yummy Christmas treat along with a Christmas card or tag. Hopefully, you’ll pick up some great ideas for your own Christmas gift giving this season. So, grab a cup of coffee, sit back, and enjoy!
Mercedes launched their 2012 car late, by missing out on the first test. It’s not clear if this delay was due to the need to repackage the car around the DRS duct, but clearly the Mercedes car needed some special adaptation to accommodate the car ducts along the car.
These ranunculus are actually from a few weeks back. My aching hand has been seriously curtailing both photo editing and blogging. As I type now, it's reminding me to not overdo it. This whole thing is getting extremely boring! I think I may hove to break down and see the doctor (something I really don't like doing...). :(
We remember together that day, and no more than one.
Vaya con Dios, Misha. Wherever you are today, I hope you're happy.
Room 800, Hubert H. Humphrey Building (Mail)
If you're a hipster and are too ashamed of your life, because you just found out that your Ray Ban glasses are fake and you still can't "ironically" wear them, you can simply erase yourself from existence by building a sky-high tower from your iPods, iPads and other Apple products you happen to have lying around, and then let it fall on you.
The images here show meaningful things that India Hicks keeps nearby -- and on view -- in her island bedroom. It's an incredibly classic, understated room and the personal tablescapes add unique interest. Nothing is there for show or prestige, but she knows the deeper significance of the collected objects.
I foresee that the issue of narco-politics will then be more visible in the synchronize local and presidential elections.
Monsters, Inc.
Still no appearance from Chung-Yong with 2 games to go means he may not play at all this campaign. The winger could make a move back to South Korea if Bolton go down or he might go to Liverpool who might be selling Dirk Kyut.
Then, we watched the "now 7th graders" march out of the gym.
Slow Down, Molasses
I told her about some weird pressure that I had in my left calf last week. I was at work and had been sitting down for about an hour. I got up and felt a lot of pressure in my left calf. It wasn't pain, but it was intense pressure. My leg wasn't swollen or hard so although I thought about a blood clot, I thought it was more likely that I had been sitting funny and cut off the circulation a little. It was lunchtime so I walked around for an hour and it eventually started to feel better. It happened again, on a much smaller scale, the morning of my appointment (which was at 3:30pm) so I told her about it and we spent a lot of time discussing it. She said my leg felt fine (not hard) but blood clots usually appear in the left leg and she wanted me to get an ultrasound of my leg done. I thought she would just give me the requisition and I would make the appointment myself, but she gave it to Jan at the end of the appointment and asked her to call around for me. Jan got me into a place right away so we went straight from Dr. A's office to the vascular ultrasound clinic. I love that, even though she thought it was probably fine, they got didn't take any chances and got me into a place the same day. When we got to the ultrasound clinic, I was seen right away and the tech told me that I didn't have a blood clot.
With a glance for one, and a glance for some,
Idealistic
So as I am severely lacking in 'light bulb' moments, I guess I'll have to pick 'light bulbs' as my topic for today.
in Second Life?
Then it’s their first prime time game, Monday 10/8 against Houston.
It is there I bow to worship. There, I lay down all my fears and worries.
Mashable also noted a study by AppData.com concluding that Pinterest – only two years old with 11.7 million active registered users has become one of the ‘top traffic driver to the websites of women’s lifestyle magazines as well as women’s blogs’.
11. The Mojo - Crazy Midnight
In 2001, the District of Columbia Bar Pro Bono Committee established the Pro Bono Initiative (PBI) to encourage D.C.’s largest law firms to increase their pro bono activities. Law firms participating in the PBI agreed to provide pro bono legal services at specified levels and to report their progress annually. At its inception, 41 law firms signed on to the PBI which number grew to 64 firms following a D.C. Bar campaign to attract additional firms.
Nick: “I did, tacos.”
We had a double header this weekend-- Mother's Day and my son's birthday! I thought it was awesome that Jonah had his sixth birthday on Mother's Day, since he was my first baby.
Ever since I was little, I knew that I would be a Mom someday. My dreams for myself would come and go, but the one constant was that I would be a Mom. As I started approaching 40, I began to think that I would have to let the dream go. Somewhere deep down, I just kept praying for the family that I always had pictured.
There's debate as to where the children went after they disappeared into the mountain, but for me the Pied Piper is not such a malevolent character as he's painted. His multi-coloured outfit hints at his membership of the motley band of trickster-fools who have danced across boundaries throughout the ages poking at entropy and stagnation with their wit and word-sticks. Perhaps the children and the rats got to see beyond the next bend in the road, and to learn by heart the map-song that the Piper played to them.
And it’s another tired D.A. video of the week!
She’s irregularly tied on the tree and can now walk freely though under close guard of an adult while her then rotting fingers are slowly healing. Her previously pale skin is getting smooth today.
Am I perfect? Nope. I do my best......but there are times where I would love to hit the "re-do" button. Do I expect others to be perfect? Nope. But I do prefer people looking in the mirror and coming to the realization themselves rather than having it bluntly pointed out to them - or worse....getting busted in a lie.
Do you know the signs of a vaccine reaction?
Ah, wouldn’t it be better- I think to myself- if instead of cursing each other we would just read Edna St.Vincent Millay to each other?
In another paragraph, Wiesel states:
This is the go-to pie pastry dating back from my childhood. Easy, no resting required.
Mary Strife at West Virginia University Library
organizations into future technologies and serves to promote the progress of science and the useful arts. Thus, the public interest factor favors CSIRO’s motion for permanent injunction.
As at any convention encouraging cosplay, there was every good and bad combination of polyester, polyurethane, and spandex-nylon blends imaginable. But, Family Guy fans or not, everyone loved Boba Fett Chicken. Shortly thereafter, I appropriately saw a man donning “I have a Boba-Fettish” panties on the outside of his pants, probably purchased at Her Universe.
Brother Alembrihan was in Northern Ethiopia where he was serving as an evangelist. He was evangelizing in the town of Gebregurach which is on the main road which goes to the Nile River from the capital. He was working among Animists (worshippers of various spirits in rocks and trees) and Ethiopian Orthodox. One of the villages he was sharing the gospel in had a powerful witchdoctor who controlled much of that village. People were fearful of him. After much evangelism, the witchdoctor decided to become a Christian. He prayed to receive Jesus and immediately went to the church to publicly profess his desire to follow Jesus. The village was in a commotion about this witchdoctor becoming a believer. At the church the elders embraced him and accepted him. They prayed for him and he recanted his demonic practices publicly. At that exact time, a lady in the village suddenly died.
When I was quitting drinking I was terrified. I think that's the main reason that many people don't sober up. You have to come to terms with how deep in you are and the idea of never drinking again is the scariest thing ever- worse than the idea of being homeless or even death. Every alcoholic I've ever talked to have said that was scary to them too. You can't imagine life without alcohol. What the hell do you do in social settings? What do you do when you're having a bad day and need to just have a quick shot? What do you do at bachelorette parties and birthday parties? New year's Eve? Brunch where mimosas are served?
Last week was my birthday and I didn't feel very well waking up on that morning.
Guerriero said the only suspect in the murders is Clem Beauchamp, who was arrested Thursday on unrelated federal charges.
You should know that I have been a fan of the ESV for years, but my enthusiasm has started to cool. First it was because of the notes in the ESV Study Bible, which I reviewed critically a few years ago (e.g., the “Daniel” in Ezekiel was a pagan hero!), and now I am perplexed with this unending series of revisions! How do I use my old ESV in class when it differs now in over a thousand verses with the new ESVs in my students’ hands? Will this be a boon for the HCSB? Please don’t tell me it is being revised!!!
X: X-rays: last ones when I broke my left arm
But emotionally, for someone like me, who had been struggling in the grey all of last year, yellow is a fine fit.
Sometimes he awoke in the morning and felt nothing; his soul leaped, for he thought he was free; he loved no longer; but in a little while, as he grew wide awake, the pain settled in his heart, and he knew that he was not cured yet.”
Consensus: The Best Exotic Marigold Hotel looks pretty, but is still one of the cheesiest and schmaltziest stories I have seen in quite some time, with a very talented cast that is pretty much wasted, and a bunch of sappy moments that show us how you can always live young and have fun. Yeah I know how! Go see The Avengers!
When I decided I was emo, I didn’t even know what emo was. I’d read somewhere that a genuine emo is one who lives the life of an emo without even knowing what an emo is. This sounds confusing because you have to be an emo to understand emo. And yet for all your innocence about things emo, you’re actually living the genuine emo lifestyle. See?
Oh, and one of my personal favorites, the old men in the bright red hats with the vintage cars.
the lakeworth
However--a word of warning. The battle is not over yet. The council has pointed out in its press release that there will be 'a fundamental review of the library service to make it fit for the 21st century'. They also use phrases like, 'merging with other local services', 'community-led independent libraries', 'prosperity or volunteering hubs'--and fostering 'intergenerational activities'. In short, they want a 'Big Society Library Service' here. But what do the council tax payers of Northamptonshire want? I just talked to Richard Purves of BBC Radio Northampton and reiterated my feelings on the importance of libraries. I hope people will hear what I had to say and want to get vocal for their own local. We have a little tiny breathing space now to think about what is next. I'll be working with my local libraries and discussing what I can do to help--but I'm only one person. We've seen what people power can do in Egypt--and what it did on behalf of libraries on 5th February 2011. So please, if you're reading this and you're in Northamptonshire--go to your local library TODAY and give them your support. We fight on!
Then it gets really ugly when someone murders Denise by drowning her in the tub, then slits her wrists to make it look like a suicide! The peace sign belt buckle and the gloves are supposed to be obvious clues!
Our Honors Day will be next Friday, May 25th. Please make plans for at least one person to attend for each child. The students will be receiving special awards and it is a very special day for them! This letter will also be coming home this week.
I gaze into the bathroom mirror, noticing a small crack that seemed too have appeared from nowhere.
Here is an example. You are Green on the Z Best Freebies NFL site and have selected the $135 Cash Gift which requires 3 referrals to go Green for you on that site. For each referral that goes Green, you agree to pay $30 and when all 3 have gone Green you collect the $135 gift. Assuming you have not done any paid advertising, you will come away from this example with a net profit of $45 ($135 Gift Payment – $90 (3 – $30 payments) to the referrals.
Like Stu, I have found performers’ on-screen personas are often the opposite of their off-screen ones. If I fancy some star or think they seem great, the last thing I would ever want to do is meet them, because they will probably turn out to be shits.
I guess it's just part of the military life that I have to get used to. At least until Mister gets out. Ahh that's another topic for another night.
Fortunately you can reprogram these ‘templates’ so they serve you better and help you to get out of your own way. First we need to identify what these thoughts and self-beliefs are that are causing the roadblock. Then, we change them and put more positive and focused ones in their place. Just like a software upgrade we can give ourselves this mind reprogramming upgrade so what we want to have happen on the ‘outside’ is a match for what is happening on the ‘inside’.
As you can see, Bristol appears to be taller than her father and she is positively towering over her mother. That is odd because other photos of the trio do not show this to be the case.
Marty
Me: Good point
your comments and emails over the past year.
What can i say Jump Smokers are cool
1181 *D-III/13/1994. “Trial by Jury as an American Palladium.” Clarence Darrow Memorial Meeting, Jackson Park and the Museum of Science and Industry, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1995(6), above, pp. 470-71, n. 33.)
I don't know how not to work, I have always had two and sometimes three jobs. Over the last 17 years, Henry has always been my second job, I took care of he and his wife until she died, and it was her dying wish to me that I take care of of him until he either died or wound up in a nursing home. About three weeks ago, he hemorrhaged and wound up in ICU they fed him four units of blood, and discharged him home, that night he fell out of bed and wound up back in the hospital, and now he is in the nursing home. He seems to think they're going to send him home after 30 days, but he'll be 97 in May, and I really hope they keep him. He's too old to live alone, he can hardly dress himself, and he's lonely. At least in the home he has companionship and someone to help him with his daily living needs at all times. He's better off there.
For instance, take note of my delightful mealtimes today. My day started with a kale/mulberry/banana smoothie. The mulberries were frozen, which we’d picked from a tree at a nearby park last summer. For lunch, I cooked up tikka masala for some friends, a family of five who came to visit – a good old-fashioned Indian curry with elk meat. No chicken tikka masala for me – I have wild game in my freezer, and so today a huge elk roast got converted to South Asian fare. For dinner, my roommate Kate brought home free Dean & Deluca sandwiches – an incredible ham and Brie with apple sandwich for my roommate Erin and I. I love Brie. Kate also brought home three bags of carrot, beet and parsnip crisps, which would have cost $9 each had we not been gifted them! Goodness gracious. They were awesome.
It's proof that we're actually living here.
Either way, good luck and happy unlocking!
Then I met Lisa, (left end in the green) what a kind hearted and funny lady she is. We share a love of cooking and blogging!! Did you notice a theme with these sisters. They are so kind and loving and are a riot to be around!
I drove to Coventry with a contingent of Party officers from Derbyshire, and we spent a very informative day at the conference. Although snow started falling around the middle of the afternoon, becoming increasingly worse, we managed to return to Derbyshire without any problems.
We are inviting applicants from community radio sector in the Western Cape that have an interest in news and current affairs, to apply for this course.
ABV: 5.5
…THERE IS A SLGT RISK OF SVR TSTMS CNTRL APPALACHIANS…MID ATLANTIC INTO SRN NY…
Several cases in which officials exposed themselves to conflicts of interest were also discovered.
It’s no different with a church. The vast majority of those who are unchurched are not actively seeking a church home. Further, they are divorced from seeing it as a need in their life, even when they are open to spiritual things and interested in spiritual things. They no longer tie their spiritual interest and longing to the need to find a particular faith, much less a particular church.
Each theme can be selected by four bloggers on first come first bases. Exception being for Indian Thali theme. For this, I will accept more than four bloggers.
So we pray.
* A written part in A Tale of Two Goblins
“He will reign over my heart for all time!”
When oil is hot, place two corn tortillas in the pan at a time, and lightly fry: about 15-30 seconds on each side. This will ensure that your tortillas are nice and flexible, so they won't break when you roll them.
Massive news this week as Activision has announced that they bought Santa Monica Studios, the developers behind Twisted Metal and The God of War series. Santa Monica Studios also teamed up with thatgamecompany to create Flower and Journey, two highly advertised games for the PSN. After regarding Journey as a failure, SMS president claimed “they didn’t get the audience they wanted” for the game. Activision, famous for the record breaking Call of Duty series, was the perfect company to collaborate with for their next title. “We have to make our games more accessible for the current generation of gamers. Activision has proven time and time again what kind of innovative and engaging gaming people ask for.” What this means for the future of God of War is uncertain, but an insider source has leaked a bit of information about the project. “God of War was unsuccessful due to the complexity of the story line. There were too many characters and too few high action moments.” Apparently, customers were unhappy that an action game based on violence did not have any projectiles and explosions. Other complaints included the lack of vehicles to make up for Kratos’s slowness. “The fourth installment of the God of War series will fix all these issues. In this new game, Zeus, who turns out to have survived after God of War 3, sends Kratos to modern times. Stripped of his famous blades, Kratos joins a secret military organization and must use modern weaponry to attack Greece and destroy what remains of Zeus’s temples. The game will be called COD of War: Modern Warfare 4.” With the billions of dollars that Activision rakes in with every Call of Duty, merging the successful franchise with other great series is a step in the right direction. According to the SMS president, the influence of Modern Warfare will not solely resonate with God of War. “We learned from our mistakes with Flower and Journey. Apart from the good graphics, these games clearly lack the value for money of online multiplayer FPS games. We are currently hard at work with a DLC for Journey. The update would allow you to use rifles to attack other players and prevent them from advancing in the game. You can also form teams and battle between temple walls. Fans will love it.” Hopefully, Series like Zelda and Mario can learn a thing or two from Santa Monica Studios and their ambitious projects.
*1 large vanilla bean (seeds scraped) - I cut the bean in half, slit it, scrap out the seeds, and add the seeds and pod to the milk mixture (1 tsp of pure vanilla extract may also be used, but beans offer the best flavor)
Link your intended post and not your whole blog.
I have a sense of wonder and sometimes feel I can relate to children easier than to adults. I love to live in the moment and to imagine things. Children too.
Karl Rove: Yes, well, at any rate Mr. President I would call Justice Scalia and see what he can do to help overturn Lawrence v. Texas.
We’ve had “Hipster Fashion: Boner or No Boner” in the works for quite some time and that will most likely be our first foray back into this feature. Additionally, you can probably expect to see interviews, op-eds, and contributions from our mens.
When the Spanish dictator Francisco Franco banned the historic and precious language of Catalan from the lips of locals in the 40′s, the survival of the culture itself was at risk. However, behind closed doors and in hushed tones the language was passed on and the culture was kept alive in proud Catalan hearts.
Club-wielding officers wearing helmets seized demonstrators and hauled them to police vehicles, dragging some by the hair, others by the neck. Several protesters were injured, including one man with blood dripping from his head down the left side of his face.
sigh..
I need to visit with Austin, Kamaree, Jeremy, and Zach about completing information for an official transcript from NOC.
I plan for something in each of these categories and then decide on what night each choice will be prepared. Some nights it has to be simple meals and others can be more complex, in terms of preparation. We also plan that Sunday to Thursday, we make double the amounts so that lunch the next day is last nights dinner.
However, a few months down the line, Marty quit. Strange, huh? He was gone and who stepped up to take his place? Lani. Now, let’s not forget that Marty had been there since the beginning. He’d stuck by those boys through changes in manager, he’d been pushed aside and called a tour manager in favor of Tim who was less than adequate. And it seemed he’d had enough.
We all love libraries. We know that. The easy access to research titles, the new fiction, the computers and databases and music and films, it's all brilliant.
1 worn
"Of course not." Ted answers, "But it's fun listening!"
Transfer the dough to a flour surface and knead for 2 minutes. Place dough ball into a large lightly oiled bowl, flipping the dough over once to coat both sides with oil. Cover bowl with plastic wrap or a damp towel and allow to rise until doubled, ~2 hours depending on your room temperature.
“I can pay you,” she offered.
"I suspect these were grabbed as souvenirs," he said.
For anyone who’s attending a Renaissance or Medieval faire, the fun can be increased by having your own costume. Wearing street clothes to a faire is completely acceptable, but it often makes people feel as though they’re only tourists, watching what’s going on but never participating. A costume, or “garb” of your own can make you really feel like you fit in.
Saleema was dressed in a black knee-length embroidered tunic with short sleeves over trousers of the same color. Her dark hair flowed across her shoulders, pinned back with dark red jewels above each ear. They gleamed in the sunlight as she peered through the ornate screen and observed a war galley approaching the nearby harbor. The northwesterly wind carried the beat of the drum commanding the oars' slow rhythmic movement. Small red and gold pennants of the Ottoman Empire flew along the ship's gunwales, with a huge one flapping at her raised stern. A voice shouted a command, and the crew busied itself furling the two lateen sails. Surmounted with a castle-like platform bristling with cannons, the galley's heavy bow cut through turquoise, nearly translucent coastal waters. Beyond, where the sea turned dark, the setting sun painted in ochers and pinks the silhouette of the Island of Dia, just a few miles from shore. The slow-moving galley sailed past the old Venetian fortress guarding the port's entrance, before approaching the jumble of traders and fishing boats moored within.
Let’s turn to this new venture. Hari Kumar’s email, sent October 20, had a deadline of October 25 – just five days to prepare an agent submission. No agents were named in the email. Claire comments that the BWA agent division is little more than an unnecessary middleman. After all, most agencies take unsolicited submissions direct. You can look them up in the W and A.
The three survivors hop in the RV to escape, and there’s a freak out back at the lab because engineering hasn’t blown the tunnel that they need to go through to get out. Engineering says they never got the message, but Richard recovers in time, blowing the tunnel just before the kids are free of the domed killing area. (And here, I’m a bit confused because several times in CABIN there’s inference made to someone sabotaging the proceedings, yet we never have the culprit revealed. Is it really supposed to be Marty? In between killing the Redneck Zombie and this moment in the film, he purposely sabotages the communication between the technicians and engineering? Is the damage he causes to the tunnel communique just luck? It seems a bit specific and a bit of a tight fit timeline-wise. Or, it seems like too much random luck.) Curt tries to jump a gorge but he runs into that invisible dome and falls to his death. Holden and Dana flee in the RV, but a zombie kills Holden, sending the RV crashing into the lake.
Today's poster features also another famous bat-villain: KILLER CROC.
Corey seems to have relaxed a bit, but there are still no good expectations for his birthmother's future. But who knows, she's already surprised everyone....
We can now see the connection that to be a powerful person on the planet, means to have a positive life:death ratio of more than 1… and this ratio is continually what it is, based on our chosen lifestyles and efforts to be healthy or unhealthy.
As many of you already know, we welcomed Miss Brooke Noel Holcombe into the world yesterday May 25, 2010 at 3:00 pm. She was 36 weeks gestation and weighed 7 lbs. 2 oz. and was 20" long. (if you didn't know, I make em BIG) I was induced due to several complications and the labor and delivery was super quick and smooth. The morning of the induction, they gave me a cervix softening agent around 9:15, gave me my epidural at 12:00 (was 2 cm dilated) and was 8 cm by 2:45. The doctor said the baby would be there within the hour, but 5 minutes after he left, I told the nurses to call him back because she was about to come out. Sure enough, I was right and had to wait on him to come back, after 1 push to get her head out and 1 push to get the rest of her body out, there she was! So blessed...
I have never thought of myself as ugly, but I have always been overweight, and to be honest, I have questioned my attractiveness for the majority of my life. But this new-found commitment to lose weight was not in an effort to increase my attractiveness, my desire in all honesty was simple. I have back issues, and had been diagnosed with high blood pressure in the past. I’m not getting any younger. It was just time to get healthy…or at least time to get healthier than I was 20 pounds ago.
Guillermo
From golden sands dunes associated with Rajasthan to palm-fringed seashores in Goa; from pristine backwaters in Kerala to picturesque hill-stations throughout Uttaranchal, Indian provides a lot for the travelers.
OG (Plato) 16.5
Oil - 1 teaspoon
to see it someday but you were sound
“Don't step on the mome raths!” came another little voice from the back seat.
Abdulkhalig and Alshafie were executed after a failed military coup backed by the communist party in July 1971. His murder and the collapse of the Soviet Union in 1989 were a big blow to the party and its influence. However, the legacy of Abdulkhalig is still there. He was subjected to an unfair military trial and they sentenced him to death. His last words; ‘A bit of awareness’, when he was asked by the judge; “What did you do to the Sudanese people?” still echo and inspire generations upon generations in the North of Sudan.
1 t. sugar
X Nonrefundable $25 application fee
Performing Arts, Spectator Sports, & Related Industries
Lord, in the mystery of the incarnation, show us the beauty of faith and the glory of our humanity made blessed in you. Amen.
6:30 - Feed myself
The most widely used and loved herbs and spices worldwide are derived from the same plant, Coriandrum sativum. The leaves of this plant are frequently referred to as cilantro, while the seeds are most commonly called coriander. Other than making any dish spectacular, the herb has the unique power of neutralizing mercury.
The stamps I used are steampunk--but then there are odd little fishies down there on the ocean floor, and I think they just added an eerie element to the painting. I have another design team post on 5/16--I promise I'll introduce the new tangle pattern then.
do the 3 trebles(dc) into the "normal"space...
Despite the years man’s traveled
Our Shop Sponsor is the lovely Emma from
Pat usually never let anything bother her. She was pretty quiet the rest of the night. She smoked a bit more, and drank a bit more. I think I would be chugging a pitcher of beer if it had been me. Of course, we took every opportunity to re-play the evening. It was a spectacular night.
We men – love it when we “sundot” women.
Amongst His earliest commands to Adam and Eve, the Lord said: “Multiply and replenish the earth.” He has repeated that commandment in our day. He has again revealed in this, the last dispensation, the principle of the eternity of the marriage covenant. He has restored to the earth the authority for entering into that covenant, and has declared that it is the only due and proper way of joining husband and wife, and the only means by which the sacred family relationship may be carried beyond the grave and through eternity. He has declared that this eternal relationship may be created only by the ordinances which are administered in the holy temples of the Lord, and therefore that his people should marry only in His temple in accordance with such ordinances.
toner cartridge : 2600/80 = 32.5 books per cartridge : $1.07 per book.
Wonder Under fusible web (1/8 yard)
-P.S. There is still plenty of time for YOU to make something, entries are not due until February 3 and is open to all mediums! If you are out of state and would like to participate, I'd be happy to help coordinate the delivery of your piece. For for more information and entry rules visit the Fiber Festival web site.
October 16 – Eagles Ballroom, Milwaukee, WI
*Whisk together all of the above Ingredients in a large mixing bowl. Once well blended, toss the sliced steak in the mixture until well coated. Cover and place in the refrigerator for at least one hour.
I have been trying to write this post for over a month now, since I returned from my Grameen Bank microfinance internship in Dhaka, Bangladesh. What made it difficult was my lack of confidence to be able to convey in words what this experience did to me, this experience of meeting Comilla Begum, a simple woman in her early 90s, during my field visit in the villages of Bangladesh. I have been thinking of what I should share, rather how, in order to portray this woman in a way that does full justice to the strength of her character.
Now remember you have 2 weeks to enter our Challenge and also you can enter anything at all as long as its a Monochrome Creation! Just add your crafty creation to the Linky below (and fingers crossed it behaves)!!
17. S'Mores Milkshake
then you know,
HTENIA 34
Perhaps they should have caught him instead on Twitter, a medium in which he was, as usual, extremely active on that day?
Because the Coen brothers and Deakins do extensive pre-production planning before they shoot—visiting each location, and planning each shot well before they shoot—studying one of the many films they’ve done together is a great way to improve your eye for cinematography. Breakdown a scene asking yourself why you think they put the camera where they did. How did they light the scene? Why did they move the camera?
I cam cum any way I like – clitorally, vaginally and anally – but that’s only after years of practice. I even had an orgasm when I was sucking a guy off, once. That wasn’t because I’d suddenly grown a clit in my throat, obviously. It was because my brain was so aroused as I was fellating him, it sent that message down to my pussy, and it made me climax. And we’ve all had those sex dreams where we’re having an orgasm so intense, it actually wakes us up. So climaxing can’t be a purely physical thing.
The trouble is, then there's the occasional glass of Dutch courage I need if I'm going somewhere and feel unconfident, like one of hubby's work parties. Or the habit I've developed of having one while I do the ironing in an evening. And there's nothing like sitting on the patio, admiring the view and watching the swallows while sipping a cold glass of white...
Time to get ready to go and sell newspapers to the early birds now, lol.
spaceship full of them
Dana Spiotta’s Stone Arabia
Each of us do intend to peacefully come and go.
I also hope to leave more comments on your blogs instead of merely thinking about them
Near sixteen years in Olney, in Bucks,
I knew that the things I was looking for were probably gone by now, but I kept on looking through the boxes, trunks and dressers up there in the attic just in case there was enough remnants left, or maybe a picture, so that I could have it replaced. I went through boxes and boxes of my mother and uncle’s things from when they were kids. Grandma kept it all from school work to drawings, broken toys to used up clothes. There were many boxes of junk I had to just throw away each week as I was cleaning the place out.
Stitches found in Needlepointing in your Nest and Merry Easter Eggs, both by Carolyn Hedge Baird. Happy stitching!
I like my heroes to be realistic. I like knowing that they have faults. It makes them more approachable. That’s why I like TV shows that have faulty lead characters.
11. Your shoes? sneakers
You’ll wish you were six feet under
On my search I found that, apparently, some of this information also exists for parts of the US. Why not for everywhere in the US and just as detailed is rather unfortunate.
What sparked the idea for the book?
I thought I would do a quick post about the cost of living in the UK to show that cost of living is pretty good here. To start off, it's important to remember a few things which we pretty much take for granted in the First World but which may seem foreign for someone living in a developing country:
Seth Mokitimi’s granddaughter spoke eloquently of her family’s pride in their grandfather and of this place that would be an embodiment of his vision for theological training and formation. “If we can inculcate a sense of balance, then there is hope,” she said.
And the prize? A free meal, a celebratory photograph and a commemorative T-shirt, presumably in extra large.
Obama did not release his client list as an attorney or his billing records. He maintained that he performed only a few hours of legal work for a nonprofit organization with ties to Tony Rezko, the Chicago businessman convicted of fraud in June 2008 but did not release billing records that would prove this assertion.
Now I am just showing how I put together a quilt top using same sized square blocks. At Treehouse we were making Hugs and Kisses blocks, but here I have made up wonky star blocks. If you have triangle blocks or square blocks on point you would do it slightly differently.
Now we go to Stephen Hill, whom they traded up for in the second round. Raw speed. Blocks. Big, tall target. The one knock is that he didn’t run many routes in the triple-option at Georgia Tech, he develops his route running, he could turn into a Braylon Edwards type. He may not be asked to do much, as Holmes, Keller and Kerley will be primary targets this year, but he’ll get his catches. What he’ll do is open up holes for the other guys with his speed.
There is a cortege of vultures sitting on the roof of this hotel. The management sends a bellboy up each day with a towel, a pillowcase, or something equally ridiculous, which he flaps at them. They flap back, and he comes down with a new gash on his leg. Tomorrow, I predict, he will not go up at all. They will have to find another bellboy. I consider the average length of time it takes for your people to learn a lesson, but perhaps I am being unfair. No lesson is more difficult than death, after all.
From my past I knew what he expected and I felt I couldn’t tell him no. I was with the man again.
He created hysterical headlines about "Muslim inbreeding " with his comments about the health risks of cousin marriages among Pakistanis. The way he spoke about the issue was as though some Frankenstein-like creatures were filling the baby wards in maternity hospitals around Oldham, Bradford, Burnley and Birmingham.
When we are fully present, we come into a flow state, where there is no resistance. Many people in sport find this is true as a way to maximize their performance.
We could see them in the distance. Colorful lights. Crowds. Best of all we could hear. Nearly there.
Thank you Annie Bell for allowing me to 'help out'.
“My mother said you were gonna exercise me!” Should I be the one to let you know that this sounds like there’s another connotation to this sentence?
In 1958, the Council on Mental Health of the American Medical Association formerly accepted hypnosis and recommended its inclusion in the curriculum of medical schools and post-graduate residencies. The British Medical Association had previously recognized hypnosis for psychiatric and surgical use.
Frank crashes up through a manhole cover, then presses a button I’ve never seen before that sets the axles up on stilts so he can pass above the cars.
Ripened Raspberry right into their hair.
Night sweats. Heart beats fast.
Saturdays: 2:00-3:45
In this day and time, with e-mail, facebook, and all the other ways of virtual connection,
TEAMeffort staff member Tim shares what he thinks about going to serve others in New Orleans, Louisiana and Ponce, Puerto Rico.
We spent about 15 minutes working our core with crunches and different plank-like exercises. The next 15 minutes we did leg things that were probably equivalent of leg press type machines. We wrapped it up with arms that I will probably be feeling soon. Overall I don’t think this reformer machine provided anything special that some free weights or a giant ball can’t do. My other critique was the way the class was taught there was no adjustment for individual level of fitness. Our instructor only explained each move once which left me scrambling trying to figure out where to put which limb where without falling over. She did instruct us which resistance level to use for each move. However, she didn’t give a range. Had I been more experienced I would have used a level lower resistance for arms (I’m weak) and a level higher resistance for legs; however, no such option was explained.
Poor Leila happened to send me an email right around that time, with information about St Colette. It was a witness story of a woman's prayers being answered for conception through the intercession of St Colette. That email came at the WRONG time. I believe I responded with something along the lines of, "Oh, thanks. That's nice. I'm so glad her prayers for ANOTHER child were answered. But her story is nothing like mine, and there is no miracle in store for me. Thanks again."
Robert Reich puts it this way:
This past March for Americorp Week (March 10th-17th), I participated in two service events: one with City Year at Ryerson Elementary and one with my team service project group.
And, once again, thank you. All of you. Your support is more appreciated than you'll ever know.
More times they won't.
5) PARTICIPATION AT ALL BLOGS IS RECOMMENDED, BUT NOT REQUIRED. REMEMBER, THE MORE BLOGS YOU HOP, THE BETTER YOUR CHANCES OF WINNING PRIZES. EVERY AUTHOR & BOOK PAGE IS WAITING TO MEET AND INTERACT WITH YOU, SO PLEASE BE SURE TO SHOW THEM SOME LOVE!
already two and a half years that would go a long way in setting the
Large portions of BAM’s archives were lost during two catastrophic events. The first was in 1903, when BAM’s original building, which was on Montague Street in Brooklyn Heights, burned down, taking practically all of the records from the institution’s first 40 years with it. And then a flood in 1977 at BAM’s current home in Fort Greene wiped out more material.
How often have I spent an entire day , lolling, watching the clouds, playing with babies, pups, reading, talking to my sweet husband, in a park.
2. NASA October 2005 Newsletter, Page 8 states,….” Clouds are the largest variable controlling Earth’s atmospheric temperature and climate. Any changes in global cloud cover may contribute to long term changes in Earth’s Climate. Contrails, especially persistent contrails, represent a human caused increase in the earths cloudiness, and are likely to be affecting climate and ultimately our natural resources…NASA October 2005.
pansies
Sometimes a really talented and eclectic cast comes together and makes something magical.
All of these points are excellent. They lack detail of course, and the devil is always in the detail, and I would have liked to have seen a little more on what would be included in the ‘great repeal’ given that later it only talks about ‘safeguards’ against the abuse of anti-terrorism laws, but really this is as good as anyone could have hoped for, even, though they may not admit it, many of the more socially-liberal Labour Party supporters. The reform of libel laws and commitment to transparency is equally as welcome as the rolling back or regulation of surveillance, and this seems to extend into other parts of the agreement for the reform of government and elections. I hope the eventual full programme will also include some rationalisation of the crazy landscape of multiple ‘commissions’ to regulate different aspects of state-citizen information relations, in favour of an expanded and more powerful Information Commissioner’s Office, but we will see. However, this is a great start (and I never, ever, thought I would be saying that about a Conservative government…).
12. Beware: Don't Listen To This Song
I had mistakenly thought that Book 4 might be the last of the Percy Jackson books, having read in Horn Book that it was the "penultimate" book of the series. I need to use the dictionary more often. Turns out "penultimate" means "next to last". Good news for all of us Percy Jackson fans!
2 bay leaves
5) Add in sugar gradually and beat till stiff peaks.
BLOOD MONEY
We wanted it to go on, and I know she won converts.
The music itself is greatly augmented by the orchestra. The ominous, hurtful, emotional maelstrom bubbling beneath the surface in Portishead’s simple, repetitive riffs and heavy rhythms is simply elevated to a new level of intensity with the subtle presence of the strings vibrating in the background. The movie soundtrack influence in many of the band’s songs is thus highlighted in a very effective way, everything becomes even more overwhelming, even larger than life. I can’t believe Portishead haven’t done a James Bond theme song yet, honestly…
Qiku
The quilt pictured was my Queensland Flood Relief auction quilt. The appeal raised over $99,000 for flood relief in 2011. My quilt raised $50, it was great to be a part of the solution.
1 illness
Apparently, those efforts didn't bear fruit. AMP's senior staff quit en masse in early August. Subsequently, Ms. Hicks became incommunicado, reportedly refusing to respond to phone calls, email, or paper mail. Scheduled books weren't released; scheduled royalty payments weren't made.
In addition to the Post Card set I used the Papertrey Ink set "Heart Print Backgrounds". Today I am playing along with the PTI 5th Anniversary Day #7 contest which was to create a card with a heart. I used the heart background set! I finished off my card with a super cute felt puffy heart (A'la Susan Opel) from Pebbles, and Offray twill and a wooden button from Oriental Trading, I love this cute little card and I thank you for visiting my blog today!
Paper - Basic Grey DP from the Olivia collection, Bazzill card and 300g hot pressed water colour paper
The wealth of the American nation depends on the productive power of our major business corporations. In 2008 there were 981 companies in the United States with 10,000 or more employees. Although they were less than two percent of all U.S. firms, they employed 27 percent of the labor force and accounted for 31 percent of all payrolls. Literally millions of smaller businesses depend, directly or indirectly, on the productivity of these big businesses and the disposable incomes of their employees.
1/2 of a 796mL can of pure pumpkin
Drizzle with melted white chocolate.
We went to the recruiting event expecting a small room and a small crowd; the type of situation where you shake a few hands, ask a few questions, sign your name on a contact list and leave with some colorful brochures. What we found was entirely different. They had reserved one of the largest rooms in the Union, and it was packed with people – not just students, but also many returned Peace Corps volunteers who were there on their own time to share their stories. And the stories, both of successes and challenges, were incredible.
There’s The Last Werewolf by Glen Duncan, which I finished two days ago. Decided to explore a few literary takes on “out there” subjects – may get to Colson Whitehead’s Zone One soon, too – and decided to tackle the Duncan after Anne’s Rice’s The Wolf Gift (in keeping with a four-legged theme, I suppose). I loved the originality of the Duncan and eagerly await this summer’s sequel, Talulla Rising. Props, too, to Mr. Duncan for making me laugh out loud at one point, a rare feat while I’m reading. (For those of you so inclined, I’ll tell you it happened with the first line of Chapter 23 – a nod to some classic Gothic lit that was both so in character and so in keeping with the storyline, I really got a kick out it.)
I hate to say it, but I seriously doubt if the Americans are going to even medal in this event. Our skaters are good, but they're up against the best in the world.
There's been a lot going on in the news this week in the US of A about homosexual rights. In North Carolina, voters passed an amendment to the state constitution that bans same-sex marriage. A CNN article on the topic notes that backers of this ammendment "celebrated by serving wedding cake to their supporters in a Raleigh ballroom." Then on Wednesday, the president publicly voiced his support for same-sex marriage.
The past few days in class we’ve been covering the skill of writing. Most of my students are trying to pass a test called CET4 in which they’ll receive a certificate (if passed), giving them better job possibilities and even higher testing options should they choose to keep excelling in English. Most of my students haven’t passed this test even though they’ve taken it 2 or 3 times. I’ve always known their English was poor, but I thought, “Surely it can’t be that hard of a test. They’re reading and listening skills aren’t so bad.”
Age of entrant
I asked if anyone had the bag of carrots. Reassured that they were in our possession we climbed into the car and went to the bus stop, located in a neighboring town. In this rural community it wasn’t a bus station: it was a drop-off point.
I have also been going through our basement 'junk' trying to get it organized in our new storage area. *big sigh* What a job that has been! I can only say that I have waaaaaaay too much stuff. It has been rather emotional going through boxes of things I have kept from my childhood. Some things are easy to part with like all the rocks I thought were pretty because they sparkled, but what do I do with my vintage Freakies magnets? Do you remember them? Who knows why I kept them, but now I have to decide if I should just throw them away or try to sell them. And is it really worth it to go through the hassle of passing them on? Ugh! I have some major baggage, and that is just one example of everything I've found!
This particular slope of rocky ravines & colorful views, for Crockett, was heaven ~ but then a rattlesnake full of hell dropped down into his earthical room & declared the both of them to be ~
I love my husband! He is the best! I think I'm still on a "love" high, with my birthday, Valentine's day, the anniversary of our first date, and also the anniversary of when we were sealed in the temple together, we've done a lot of reminiscing and had a lot of fun together this past month. But now that we're almost to March and my Irish heritage is seeping out, too, so I decided to combine the two in to a printable. What?! Well, let me explain, I was thinking about the word "lucky", which made me think of how lucky I am to be married to my best friend, which made this song pop into my head (my girls are laughing now because everything makes a song pop into my head. I've become my mom. :) )
Until tomorrow, peace
I have a question for Osama Bin laden regard of this whole Virgin deal. Well it may be too late. However, these are my questions. Didn’t you advised your disciples to volunteer to blow up and kill infidels. Didn’t you tell them that dying for God is beautiful andwill be reworded with seventy two virgins. So why didn’t you blow up before you get killed. Did you forget to press the button on your west? What happened? did you freeze? It is easy said than done isn’t it?
Diabetes is going to have a hell of a time trying to snare me again.
Corn flour:4 tbsp
Small gifts from a trip, to give to family and friends at your destination and when you get back home.
Cartoon Network (CartoonNetwork.com), currently seen in more than 99 million U.S. homes and 207 countries around the world, is Turner Broadcasting System, Inc.’s ad-supported cable service now available in HD offering the best in original, acquired and classic entertainment for youth and families. Nightly from 9 p.m. to 6 a.m. (ET, PT), Cartoon Network shares its channel space with Adult Swim, a late-night destination showcasing original and acquired animated and live-action programming for young adults 18-34.
When you sit down to add up your monthly bills, you are surprised to find you are spending $2,000 a month, but all the receipts have nothing to do with making a greeting card. Rather, they are for rent, business lunches, a new drafting table, art books and business cards.
1 teaspoon fresh Asian chili paste (or chili garlic sauce)
Nora is getting an echo done right now. Please pray.
I still do not like the changes one bit and Frieda is right, I DO NOT like it when someone moves the furniture on me , much less moves my cheese, but I an not in charge of them and over all they have been the least Orwellian of the formats out there so I will adjust....dammit !
The assumption is that once the Animus was defeated, the Menoptera, Zarbi and the rest of the inhabitants of Vortis were able to live together in peace.
And with more than 31 million children participating in the national school lunch and breakfast programs, good nutrition at school is more important than ever.
I'm going to name names here. It's an Epson. Initially I was having a good time with it, chugging away as it was in the background (it's loud and a tad violent, but it was getting the job done). Then the whole cartridge who-ha began...
they don’t let you gain too much weight
4 - Bill Monroe - Uncle Pen - 2:47
